Ohio, session 136, HB470.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That sections 3501.05, 3503.09, 3503.12, 8
3503.13, 3503.16, 3503.19, 3503.21, 3503.28, 3503.30, 3503.33, 9
3505.181, 3505.183, 3599.11, 3599.18, 4506.07, 4507.06, and 10
4507.51 be amended and new section 3503.11 of the Revised Code 11
be enacted to read as follows: 12
Sec. 3501.05. The secretary of state shall do all of the 13
following: 14
(A) Appoint all members of boards of elections; 15
(B) Issue instructions by directives and advisories in 16
accordance with section 3501.053 of the Revised Code to members 17
of the boards as to the proper methods of conducting elections. 18

H. B. No. 470 Page 2
As Introduced
(C) Prepare rules and instructions for the conduct of 19
elections; 20
(D) Publish and furnish to the boards from time to time a 21
sufficient number of indexed copies of all election laws then in 22
force; 23
(E) Edit and issue all pamphlets concerning proposed laws 24
or amendments required by law to be submitted to the voters; 25
(F) Prescribe the form of registration cards, blanks, and 26
records; 27
(G) Determine and prescribe the forms of ballots and the 28
forms of all blanks, cards of instructions, pollbooks, tally 29
sheets, certificates of election, and forms and blanks required 30
by law for use by candidates, committees, and boards; 31
(H) Prepare the ballot title or statement to be placed on 32
the ballot for any proposed law or amendment to the constitution 33
to be submitted to the voters of the state; 34
(I) Except as otherwise provided in section 3519.08 of the 35
Revised Code, certify to the several boards the forms of ballots 36
and names of candidates for state offices, and the form and 37
wording of state referendum questions and issues, as they shall 38
appear on the ballot; 39
(J) Except as otherwise provided in division (I)(2)(b) of 40
section 3501.38 of the Revised Code, give final approval to 41
ballot language for any local question or issue approved and 42
transmitted by boards of elections under section 3501.11 of the 43
Revised Code; 44
(K) Receive all initiative and referendum petitions on 45
state questions and issues and determine and certify to the 46

H. B. No. 470 Page 3
As Introduced
sufficiency of those petitions; 47
(L) Require such reports from the several boards as are 48
provided by law, or as the secretary of state considers 49
necessary; 50
(M) Compel the observance by election officers in the 51
several counties of the requirements of the election laws; 52
(N)(1) Except as otherwise provided in division (N)(2) of 53
this section, investigate the administration of election laws, 54
frauds, and irregularities in elections in any county, and 55
report violations of election laws to the attorney general or 56
prosecuting attorney, or both, for prosecution; 57
(2) On and after August 24, 1995, report a failure to 58
comply with or a violation of a provision in sections 3517.08 to 59
3517.13, 3517.20 to 3517.22, 3599.03, or 3599.031 of the Revised 60
Code, whenever the secretary of state has or should have 61
knowledge of a failure to comply with or a violation of a 62
provision in one of those sections, by filing a complaint with 63
the Ohio elections commission under section 3517.153 of the 64
Revised Code. 65
(O) Make an annual report to the governor containing the 66
results of elections, the cost of elections in the various 67
counties, a tabulation of the votes in the several political 68
subdivisions, and other information and recommendations relative 69
to elections the secretary of state considers desirable; 70
(P) Prescribe and distribute to boards of elections a list 71
of instructions indicating all legal steps necessary to petition 72
successfully for local option elections under sections 4301.32 73
to 4301.41, 4303.29, 4305.14, and 4305.15 of the Revised Code; 74
(Q) Adopt rules pursuant to Chapter 119. of the Revised 75

H. B. No. 470 Page 4
As Introduced
Code for the removal by boards of elections of ineligible voters 76
from the statewide voter registration database and, if 77
applicable, from the poll list or signature pollbook used in 78
each precinct, which rules shall provide for all of the 79
following: 80
(1) A process for the removal of voters who have changed 81
residence, which shall be uniform, nondiscriminatory, and in 82
compliance with the Voting Rights Act of 1965 and the National 83
Voter Registration Act of 1993, including a program that uses 84
the national change of address service provided by the United 85
States postal system through its licensees; 86
(2) A process for the removal of ineligible voters through 87
the automatic voter registration system described in section 88
3503.11 of the Revised Code or under section 3503.21 of the 89
Revised Code; 90
(3) A process to correct errors in removing a voter's 91
voter registration under division (Q)(2) of this section so the 92
improperly removed voter can have the voter's registration 93
immediately restored and the voter can cast a ballot that shall 94
be counted as if the voter were never removed; 95
(4) A uniform system for marking or removing the name of a 96
voter who is ineligible to vote from the statewide voter 97
registration database and, if applicable, from the poll list or 98
signature pollbook used in each precinct and noting the reason 99
for that mark or removal. 100
(R)(1) Prescribe a general program for registering voters 101
or updating voter registration information, such as name and 102
residence changes, by boards of elections, designated agencies, 103
public high schools and vocational schools, public libraries, 104

H. B. No. 470 Page 5
As Introduced
and offices of county treasurers consistent with the 105
requirements of section 3503.09 of the Revised Code; 106
(2) Prescribe a general program for registering voters or 107
updating voter registration information through the registrar of 108
motor vehicles and deputy registrars, consistent with the 109
requirements of Adopt rules pursuant to Chapter 119. of the 110
Revised Code to develop, implement, and administer the automatic 111
voter registration system described in section 3503.11 of the 112
Revised Code including rules prescribing procedures for the 113
secretary of state and the bureau of motor vehicles and 114
department of medicaid to follow to ensure that only United 115
States citizens who are eligible electors are registered to vote 116
through the system; 117
(3) Release monthly data reports to the public available 118
on the secretary of state's official public web site that 119
include the following information: 120
(a) The number of individuals registered to vote or 121
preregistered to vote under section 3503.11 of the Revised Code; 122
(b) The number of individuals who declined voter 123
registration or voter preregistration under section 3503.11 of 124
the Revised Code. 125
(S) Prescribe a program of distribution of voter 126
registration forms through boards of elections, designated 127
agencies, offices of the registrar and deputy registrars of 128
motor vehicles, public high schools and vocational schools, 129
public libraries, and offices of county treasurers; 130
(T) To the extent feasible, provide copies, at no cost and 131
upon request, of the voter registration form in post offices in 132
this state; 133

H. B. No. 470 Page 6
As Introduced
(U) Adopt rules pursuant to section 111.15 of the Revised 134
Code for the purpose of implementing the programs for 135
registering voters through boards of elections, designated 136
agencies, and the offices of the registrar and deputy registrars 137
of motor vehicles consistent with this chapter; 138
(V) Establish the full-time position of Americans with 139
Disabilities Act coordinator within the office of the secretary 140
of state to do all of the following: 141
(1) Assist the secretary of state with ensuring that there 142
is equal access to polling places for persons with disabilities; 143
(2) Assist the secretary of state with ensuring that each 144
voter may cast the voter's ballot in a manner that provides the 145
same opportunity for access and participation, including privacy 146
and independence, as for other voters; 147
(3) Advise the secretary of state in the development of 148
standards for the certification of voting machines, marking 149
devices, and automatic tabulating equipment. 150
(W) Establish and maintain a computerized statewide 151
database of all legally registered voters under section 3503.15 152
of the Revised Code that complies with the requirements of the 153
"Help America Vote Act of 2002," Pub. L. No. 107-252, 116 Stat. 154
1666, and provide training in the operation of that system; 155
(X) Ensure that all directives, advisories, other 156
instructions, or decisions issued or made during or as a result 157
of any conference or teleconference call with a board of 158
elections to discuss the proper methods and procedures for 159
conducting elections, to answer questions regarding elections, 160
or to discuss the interpretation of directives, advisories, or 161
other instructions issued by the secretary of state are posted 162

H. B. No. 470 Page 7
As Introduced
on a web site of the office of the secretary of state as soon as 163
is practicable after the completion of the conference or 164
teleconference call, but not later than the close of business on 165
the same day as the conference or teleconference call takes 166
place. 167
(Y) Publish a report on a web site of the office of the 168
secretary of state not later than one month after the completion 169
of the canvass of the election returns for each primary and 170
general election, identifying, by county, the number of absent 171
voter's ballots cast and the number of those ballots that were 172
counted, and the number of provisional ballots cast and the 173
number of those ballots that were counted, for that election. 174
The secretary of state shall maintain the information on the web 175
site in an archive format for each subsequent election. 176
(Z) Conduct voter education outlining voter 177
identification, absent voters ballot, provisional ballot, and 178
other voting requirements; 179
(AA) Establish a procedure by which a registered elector 180
may make available to a board of elections a more recent current 181
signature to be used in the poll list or signature pollbook 182
produced by the board of elections of the county in which the 183
elector resides; 184
(BB) Disseminate information, which may include all or 185
part of the official explanations and arguments, by means of 186
direct mail or other written publication, broadcast, or other 187
means or combination of means, as directed by the Ohio ballot 188
board under division (F) of section 3505.062 of the Revised 189
Code, in order to inform the voters as fully as possible 190
concerning each proposed constitutional amendment, proposed law, 191
or referendum; 192

H. B. No. 470 Page 8
As Introduced
(CC) Be the single state office responsible for the 193
implementation of the "Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee 194
Voting Act," Pub. L. No. 99-410, 100 Stat. 924, 42 52 U.S.C. 195
1973ff20301, et seq., as amended, in this state. The secretary 196
of state may delegate to the boards of elections 197
responsibilities for the implementation of that act, including 198
responsibilities arising from amendments to that act made by the 199
"Military and Overseas Voter Empowerment Act," Subtitle H of the 200
"National Defense Authorization Act for Fiscal Year 2010," Pub. 201
L. No. 111-84, 123 Stat. 3190. 202
(DD) Adopt rules, under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, 203
to establish procedures and standards for determining when a 204
board of elections shall be placed under the official oversight 205
of the secretary of state, placing a board of elections under 206
the official oversight of the secretary of state, a board that 207
is under official oversight to transition out of official 208
oversight, and the secretary of state to supervise a board of 209
elections that is under official oversight of the secretary of 210
state. 211
(EE) Perform other duties required by law. 212
Whenever a primary election is held under section 3513.32 213
of the Revised Code or a special election is held under section 214
3521.03 of the Revised Code to fill a vacancy in the office of 215
representative to congress, the secretary of state shall 216
establish a deadline, notwithstanding any other deadline 217
required under the Revised Code, by which any or all of the 218
following shall occur: the filing of a declaration of candidacy 219
and petitions or a statement of candidacy and nominating 220
petition together with the applicable filing fee; the filing of 221
protests against the candidacy of any person filing a 222

H. B. No. 470 Page 9
As Introduced
declaration of candidacy or nominating petition; the filing of a 223
declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate; the filing of 224
campaign finance reports; the preparation of, and the making of 225
corrections or challenges to, precinct voter registration lists; 226
the receipt of applications for absent voter's ballots or 227
uniformed services or overseas absent voter's ballots; the 228
supplying of election materials to precincts by boards of 229
elections; the holding of hearings by boards of elections to 230
consider challenges to the right of a person to appear on a 231
voter registration list; and the scheduling of programs to 232
instruct or reinstruct election officers. 233
In the performance of the secretary of state's duties as 234
the chief election officer, the secretary of state may 235
administer oaths, issue subpoenas, summon witnesses, compel the 236
production of books, papers, records, and other evidence, and 237
fix the time and place for hearing any matters relating to the 238
administration and enforcement of the election laws. 239
In any controversy involving or arising out of the 240
adoption of registration or the appropriation of funds for 241
registration, the secretary of state may, through the attorney 242
general, bring an action in the name of the state in the court 243
of common pleas of the county where the cause of action arose or 244
in an adjoining county, to adjudicate the question. 245
In any action involving the laws in Title XXXV of the 246
Revised Code wherein the interpretation of those laws is in 247
issue in such a manner that the result of the action will affect 248
the lawful duties of the secretary of state or of any board of 249
elections, the secretary of state may, on the secretary of 250
state's motion, be made a party. 251
The secretary of state may apply to any court that is 252

H. B. No. 470 Page 10
As Introduced
hearing a case in which the secretary of state is a party, for a 253
change of venue as a substantive right, and the change of venue 254
shall be allowed, and the case removed to the court of common 255
pleas of an adjoining county named in the application or, if 256
there are cases pending in more than one jurisdiction that 257
involve the same or similar issues, the court of common pleas of 258
Franklin county. 259
Public high schools and vocational schools, public 260
libraries, and the office of a county treasurer shall implement 261
voter registration programs as directed by the secretary of 262
state pursuant to this section. 263
Sec. 3503.09. (A)(1) The secretary of state shall adopt 264
rules for the electronic transmission by boards of elections, 265
designated agencies, public high schools and vocational schools, 266
public libraries, and offices of county treasurers, where 267
applicable, of change of name and change of residence changes 268
forms for voter registration records in the statewide voter 269
registration database. 270
(2) The secretary of state shall adopt rules for the 271
purpose of improving the speed of processing new voter 272
registrations that permit information from a voter registration 273
application received by a designated agency to be made available 274
electronically, in addition to requiring the original voter 275
registration application to be transmitted to the applicable 276
board of elections under division (E)(2) of section 3503.10 of 277
the Revised Code. 278
(B) Rules adopted under division (A) of this section shall 279
do all of the following: 280
(1) Prohibit any direct electronic connection between a 281

H. B. No. 470 Page 11
As Introduced
designated agency, public high school or vocational school, 282
public library, or office of a county treasurer and the 283
statewide voter registration database; 284
(2) Require any updated voter registration information to 285
be verified by the secretary of state or a board of elections 286
before the information is added to the statewide voter 287
registration database for the purpose of modifying an existing 288
voter registration; 289
(3) Require each designated agency that transmits voter 290
registration information electronically to transmit an 291
identifier for data relating to each new voter registration that 292
shall be used by the secretary of state or a board of elections 293
to match the electronic data to the original voter registration 294
application. 295
(C) This section does not apply to information transmitted 296
to the secretary of state under section 3503.11 of the Revised 297
Code. 298
Sec. 3503.11. (A)(1) The bureau of motor vehicles and 299
department of medicaid shall provide to the secretary of state, 300
once per business day, electronic records concerning each person 301
who appears to be eligible to register to vote or to update the 302
person's registration and about whom the bureau or department 303
possesses the information listed in division (A)(2) of this 304
section for the purpose of automatically registering the person 305
to vote in accordance with this section. 306
(2) A bureau or department that is required to transmit 307
information concerning a person under division (A)(1) of this 308
section shall transmit all of the following information 309
concerning that person: 310

H. B. No. 470 Page 12
As Introduced
(a) The person's legal name; 311
(b) The person's residence address; 312
(c) The person's date of birth; 313
(d) The number of the person's driver's license or state 314
identification card or the last four digits of the person's 315
social security number; 316
(e) Whether the person is a United States citizen; 317
(f) An electronic image of the person's signature. 318
(B)(1) Upon receiving the information concerning a person 319
under division (A) of this section, the secretary of state shall 320
transmit that information to the board of elections of the 321
county in which the person resides. The board shall determine 322
whether the person is eligible to register to vote or to update 323
the person's registration and, if the person is eligible, shall 324
send the person a notice, on a form prescribed by the secretary 325
of state, that contains all of the following information: 326
(a) The fact that the person will be registered to vote or 327
have the person's registration updated unless the person 328
declines to be registered to vote or update the person's 329
registration; 330
(b) The procedure to decline to be registered to vote or 331
to update the person's registration; 332
(c) The bureau or department that provided the information 333
that will be used to register the person to vote or update the 334
person's registration; 335
(d) The precinct in which the person will be registered to 336
vote; 337

H. B. No. 470 Page 13
As Introduced
(e) A statement in bold type as follows: 338
"Voters must bring photo identification to the polls in 339
order to verify identity. Voters who do not provide photo 340
identification will still be able to vote by casting a 341
provisional ballot." 342
(2) The notice shall be by nonforwardable mail. If the 343
notice is returned to the board, it shall investigate and cause 344
the notice to be delivered to the correct address. 345
(C)(1) Except as provided in division (C)(3)(a) of this 346
section, not earlier than twenty-one days after sending the 347
notice described in division (B) of this section to a person, 348
the board of elections shall register the person to vote or 349
update the person's registration, as applicable. The electronic 350
record transmitted to the board of elections under this section 351
shall be considered to be the person's voter registration form. 352
(2)(a) If, after investigating as required under division 353
(B)(2) of this section, the board is unable to verify the 354
person's correct address, it shall register the person to vote 355
and shall cause the person's name in the official registration 356
list and in the poll list or signature pollbook to be marked to 357
indicate that the person's notice was returned to the board. 358
At the first election at which an elector whose name has 359
been so marked appears to vote, the elector shall be required to 360
provide identification to the election officials and to vote by 361
provisional ballot under section 3505.181 of the Revised Code. 362
If the provisional ballot is counted pursuant to division (B)(3) 363
of section 3505.183 of the Revised Code, the board shall correct 364
the elector's registration, if needed, and shall remove the 365
indication that the elector's notice was returned from that 366

H. B. No. 470 Page 14
As Introduced
elector's name on the official registration list and on the poll 367
list or signature pollbook. If the provisional ballot is not 368
counted pursuant to division (B)(4)(a)(i), (v), or (vi) of 369
section 3503.183 of the Revised Code, the elector's registration 370
shall be canceled. The board shall notify the elector by United 371
States mail of the cancellation. 372
(b) If the notice described in division (B)(1) of this 373
section is sent by nonforwardable mail and is returned 374
undelivered, the person shall be registered as provided in 375
division (C)(1) of this section and sent a confirmation notice 376
by forwardable mail. If the person fails to respond to the 377
confirmation notice, update the person's registration, or vote 378
by provisional ballot as provided in division (C)(2)(a) of this 379
section in any election during the next four-year period, which 380
includes two federal elections, subsequent to the mailing of the 381
confirmation notice, the person's registration shall be 382
canceled. 383
(3)(a) A board of elections shall not register a person to 384
vote or update an elector's registration under this section if 385
the board determines that the person is not eligible to register 386
or if the person declines to register or to update the elector's 387
registration. 388
(b) If, after a person has been registered to vote under 389
this section, the person declines to register, the board of 390
elections shall treat the declination as a request to cancel the 391
person's registration. 392
(c) If, after an elector's registration has been updated 393
under this section, the elector declines to update the elector's 394
registration, the board of elections shall correct the elector's 395
registration to reflect the name, address, or both, as 396

H. B. No. 470 Page 15
As Introduced
applicable, that it contained before the board updated the 397
elector's registration. 398
Sec. 3503.12. All registrations shall be carefully 399
checked, and in case any person is found to have registered more 400
than onceone registration form, the additional registration 401
forms shall be canceled by the board of elections. 402
Six weeks prior to the day of a special, primary, or 403
general election, the board shall publish notices in one or more 404
newspapers of general circulation advertising the places, dates, 405
times, methods of registration, and voter qualifications for 406
registration. 407
The board shall establish a schedule or program to assure 408
to the extent reasonably possible that, on or before November 1, 409
1980, all registration places shall be free of barriers that 410
would impede the ingress and egress of persons with 411
disabilities. Entrances shall be level or shall be provided with 412
a nonskid ramp of not over eight per cent gradient, and doors 413
shall be a minimum of thirty-two inches wide. Registration 414
places located at polling places shall, however, comply with the 415
requirements of section 3501.29 of the Revised Code for the 416
elimination of barriers. 417
As used in this section, "persons with disabilities" means 418
persons who have lost the use of one or both legs, one or both 419
arms, or any combination thereof, or are blind or so severely 420
impaired as to be unable to move about without the aid of 421
crutches or a wheelchair. 422
Sec. 3503.13. (A)(1) Except as otherwise provided in 423
division (A)(2) of this section, voter registration forms 424
submitted by applicants and the statewide voter registration 425

H. B. No. 470 Page 16
As Introduced
database established under section 3503.15 of the Revised Code 426
are public records subject to disclosure under section 149.43 of 427
the Revised Code. 428
(2) None of the following are subject to disclosure under 429
division (A)(1) of this section: 430
(a) An elector's full or partial social security number, 431
driver's license or state identification card number, telephone 432
number, or electronic mail address; 433
(b) A confidential voter registration record, as described 434
in section 111.44 of the Revised Code; 435
(c) The address of a designated public service worker, if 436
the designated public service worker has submitted a redaction 437
request to the board of elections under section 149.45 of the 438
Revised Code; 439
(d) Any other information that is prohibited from being 440
disclosed by state or federal law. 441
(B) A board of elections may use a legible digitized 442
signature list of voter signatures, copied from the signatures 443
on the registration forms in a form and manner prescribed by the 444
secretary of state, provided that the board includes the 445
required voter registration information in the statewide voter 446
registration database established under section 3503.15 of the 447
Revised Code, and provided that the precinct election officials 448
have computer printouts at the polls prepared in the manner 449
required under section 3503.23 of the Revised Code. 450
Sec. 3503.16. (A) Except as otherwise provided in division 451
(E) of section 111.44 of the Revised Code, whenever a registered 452
elector changes the place of residence of that registered 453
elector from one precinct to another within a county or from one 454

H. B. No. 470 Page 17
As Introduced
county to another, or has a change of name, that registered 455
elector shall report the change by delivering doing any of the 456
following: 457
(1) Delivering a change of residence or change of name 458
form, whichever is appropriate, as prescribed by the secretary 459
of state under section 3503.14 of the Revised Code to the state 460
or local office of a designated agency, a public high school or 461
vocational school, a public library, the office of the county 462
treasurer, the office of the secretary of state, any office of 463
the registrar or deputy registrar of motor vehicles, or any 464
office of a board of elections in person or by a third person. 465
Any voter registration, change of address, or change of name 466
application, returned by mail, may be sent only to the secretary 467
of state or the board of elections. 468
A registered elector also may update the registration of 469
that registered elector by filing (2) Submitting the elector's 470
current residence or name information to the bureau of motor 471
vehicles, department of medicaid, or to a designated agency in 472
the manner directed by the bureau, department, or designated 473
agency, as applicable; 474
(3) Submitting an application through the online voter 475
registration system created under section 3503.20 of the Revised 476
Code; 477
(4) Filing a change of residence or change of name form on 478
the day of a special, primary, or general election at the 479
polling place in the precinct in which that registered elector 480
resides or at the board of elections or at another site 481
designated by the board. 482
(B)(1)(a) Any registered elector who moves within a 483

H. B. No. 470 Page 18
As Introduced
precinct on or prior to the day of a general, primary, or 484
special election and has not filed a notice of reported the 485
change of residence in accordance with the board of elections 486
division (A) of this section may vote in that election by going 487
to that registered elector's assigned polling place, completing 488
and signing a notice of change of residence, showing photo 489
identification, and casting a ballot. 490
(b) Any registered elector who changes the name of that 491
registered elector and remains within a precinct on or prior to 492
the day of a general, primary, or special election and has not 493
filed a notice of reported the change of name in accordance with 494
the board of elections division (A) of this section may vote in 495
that election by going to that registered elector's assigned 496
polling place, completing and signing a notice of a change of 497
name, and casting a provisional ballot under section 3505.181 of 498
the Revised Code. If the registered elector provides to the 499
precinct election officials proof of a legal name change, such 500
as a marriage license or court order that includes the elector's 501
current and prior names, the elector may complete and sign a 502
notice of change of name and cast a regular ballot. 503
(2) Any registered elector who moves from one precinct to 504
another within a county or moves from one precinct to another 505
and changes the name of that registered elector on or prior to 506
the day of a general, primary, or special election and has not 507
filed a notice of reported the change of residence or change of 508
name, whichever is appropriate, in accordance with the board of 509
elections division (A) of this section may vote in that election 510
if that registered elector complies with division (G) of this 511
section or does all of the following: 512
(a) Appears at anytime during regular business hours on or 513

H. B. No. 470 Page 19
As Introduced
after the twenty-eighth day prior to the election in which that 514
registered elector wishes to vote or, if the election is held on 515
the day of a presidential primary election, the twenty-fifth day 516
prior to the election, through noon of the Saturday prior to the 517
election at the office of the board of elections, appears at any 518
time during regular business hours on the Monday prior to the 519
election at the office of the board of elections, or appears on 520
the day of the election at either of the following locations: 521
(i) The polling place for the precinct in which that 522
registered elector resides; 523
(ii) The office of the board of elections or, if pursuant 524
to division (C) of section 3501.10 of the Revised Code the board 525
has designated another location in the county at which 526
registered electors may vote, at that other location instead of 527
the office of the board of elections. 528
(b) Completes and signs, under penalty of election 529
falsification, the written affirmation on the provisional ballot 530
envelope, which shall serve as a notice of change of residence 531
or change of name, whichever is appropriate; 532
(c) Votes a provisional ballot under section 3505.181 of 533
the Revised Code at the polling place, at the office of the 534
board of elections, or, if pursuant to division (C) of section 535
3501.10 of the Revised Code the board has designated another 536
location in the county at which registered electors may vote, at 537
that other location instead of the office of the board of 538
elections, whichever is appropriate, using the address to which 539
that registered elector has moved or the name of that registered 540
elector as changed, whichever is appropriate; 541
(d) Completes and signs, under penalty of election 542

H. B. No. 470 Page 20
As Introduced
falsification, a statement attesting that that registered 543
elector moved or had a change of name, whichever is appropriate, 544
on or prior to the day of the election, has voted a provisional 545
ballot at the polling place for the precinct in which that 546
registered elector resides, at the office of the board of 547
elections, or, if pursuant to division (C) of section 3501.10 of 548
the Revised Code the board has designated another location in 549
the county at which registered electors may vote, at that other 550
location instead of the office of the board of elections, 551
whichever is appropriate, and will not vote or attempt to vote 552
at any other location for that particular election. 553
(C) Any registered elector who moves from one county to 554
another county within the state on or prior to the day of a 555
general, primary, or special election and has not registered to 556
vote in the county to which that registered elector moved 557
reported the change of residence in accordance with division (A) 558
of this section may vote in that election if that registered 559
elector complies with division (G) of this section or does all 560
of the following: 561
(1) Appears at any time during regular business hours on 562
or after the twenty-eighth day prior to the election in which 563
that registered elector wishes to vote or, if the election is 564
held on the day of a presidential primary election, the twenty- 565
fifth day prior to the election, through noon of the Saturday 566
prior to the election at the office of the board of elections 567
or, if pursuant to division (C) of section 3501.10 of the 568
Revised Code the board has designated another location in the 569
county at which registered electors may vote, at that other 570
location instead of the office of the board of elections, 571
appears during regular business hours on the Monday prior to the 572
election at the office of the board of elections or, if pursuant 573

H. B. No. 470 Page 21
As Introduced
to division (C) of section 3501.10 of the Revised Code the board 574
has designated another location in the county at which 575
registered electors may vote, at that other location instead of 576
the office of the board of elections, or appears on the day of 577
the election at the office of the board of elections or, if 578
pursuant to division (C) of section 3501.10 of the Revised Code 579
the board has designated another location in the county at which 580
registered electors may vote, at that other location instead of 581
the office of the board of elections; 582
(2) Completes and signs, under penalty of election 583
falsification, the written affirmation on the provisional ballot 584
envelope, which shall serve as a notice of change of residence; 585
(3) Votes a provisional ballot under section 3505.181 of 586
the Revised Code at the office of the board of elections or, if 587
pursuant to division (C) of section 3501.10 of the Revised Code 588
the board has designated another location in the county at which 589
registered electors may vote, at that other location instead of 590
the office of the board of elections, using the address to which 591
that registered elector has moved; 592
(4) Completes and signs, under penalty of election 593
falsification, a statement attesting that that registered 594
elector has moved from one county to another county within the 595
state on or prior to the day of the election, has voted at the 596
office of the board of elections or, if pursuant to division (C) 597
of section 3501.10 of the Revised Code the board has designated 598
another location in the county at which registered electors may 599
vote, at that other location instead of the office of the board 600
of elections, and will not vote or attempt to vote at any other 601
location for that particular election. 602
(D) A person who votes by absent voter's ballots pursuant 603

H. B. No. 470 Page 22
As Introduced
to division (G) of this section shall not make written 604
application for the ballots pursuant to Chapter 3509. of the 605
Revised Code. Ballots cast pursuant to division (G) of this 606
section shall be set aside in a special envelope and counted 607
during the official canvass of votes in the manner provided for 608
in sections 3505.32 and 3509.06 of the Revised Code insofar as 609
that manner is applicable. The board shall examine the pollbooks 610
to verify that no ballot was cast at the polls or by absent 611
voter's ballots under Chapter 3509. or 3511. of the Revised Code 612
by an elector who has voted by absent voter's ballots pursuant 613
to division (G) of this section. Any ballot determined to be 614
insufficient for any of the reasons stated above or stated in 615
section 3509.07 of the Revised Code shall not be counted. 616
Subject to division (C) of section 3501.10 of the Revised 617
Code, a board of elections may lease or otherwise acquire a site 618
different from the office of the board at which registered 619
electors may vote pursuant to division (B) or (C) of this 620
section. 621
(E) Upon Except as otherwise provided in section 3503.11 622
of the Revised Code, upon receiving a notice of change of 623
residence or change of name form, the board of elections shall 624
immediately send the registrant an acknowledgment notice. If the 625
change of residence or change of name notice is valid, the board 626
shall update the voter's registration as appropriate. If that 627
form is incomplete, the board shall inform the registrant in the 628
acknowledgment notice specified in this division of the 629
information necessary to complete or update that registrant's 630
registration. 631
(F) Change of residence and change of name forms shall be 632
available at each polling place, and when these forms are 633

H. B. No. 470 Page 23
As Introduced
completed, noting changes of residence or name, as appropriate, 634
they shall be filed with election officials at the polling 635
place. Election officials shall return completed forms, together 636
with the pollbooks and tally sheets, to the board of elections. 637
The board of elections shall provide change of residence 638
and change of name forms to the probate court and court of 639
common pleas. The court shall provide the forms to any person 640
eighteen years of age or older who has a change of name by order 641
of the court or who applies for a marriage license. The court 642
shall forward all completed forms to the board of elections 643
within five days after receiving them. 644
(G) A registered elector who otherwise would qualify to 645
vote under division (B) or (C) of this section but is unable to 646
appear at the office of the board of elections or, if pursuant 647
to division (C) of section 3501.10 of the Revised Code the board 648
has designated another location in the county at which 649
registered electors may vote, at that other location, on account 650
of personal illness, physical disability, or infirmity, may vote 651
on the day of the election if that registered elector does all 652
of the following: 653
(1) Makes a written application on a form prescribed by 654
the secretary of state that includes all of the information 655
required under section 3509.03 of the Revised Code to the 656
appropriate board for an absent voter's ballot on or after the 657
twenty-seventh day prior to the election in which the registered 658
elector wishes to vote through the close of business on the 659
seventh day prior to that election and requests that the absent 660
voter's ballot be sent to the address to which the registered 661
elector has moved if the registered elector has moved, or to the 662
address of that registered elector who has not moved but has had 663

H. B. No. 470 Page 24
As Introduced
a change of name; 664
(2) Declares that the registered elector has moved or had 665
a change of name, whichever is appropriate, and otherwise is 666
qualified to vote under the circumstances described in division 667
(B) or (C) of this section, whichever is appropriate, but that 668
the registered elector is unable to appear at the board of 669
elections because of personal illness, physical disability, or 670
infirmity; 671
(3) Completes and returns along with the completed absent 672
voter's ballot a notice of change of residence indicating the 673
address to which the registered elector has moved, or a notice 674
of change of name, whichever is appropriate; 675
(4) Completes and signs, under penalty of election 676
falsification, a statement attesting that the registered elector 677
has moved or had a change of name on or prior to the day before 678
the election, has voted by absent voter's ballot because of 679
personal illness, physical disability, or infirmity that 680
prevented the registered elector from appearing at the board of 681
elections, and will not vote or attempt to vote at any other 682
location or by absent voter's ballot mailed to any other 683
location or address for that particular election. 684
Sec. 3503.19. (A) (A)(1) Persons qualified to register or 685
to change their registration because of a change of address or 686
change of name may register or change their registration in by 687
doing any of the following: 688
(a) Submitting a voter registration or change of address 689
or change of name form in person or through another person at 690
any state or local office of a designated agency, at the office 691
of the registrar or any deputy registrar of motor vehicles, at a 692

H. B. No. 470 Page 25
As Introduced
public high school or vocational school, at a public library, at 693
the office of a county treasurer, or at a branch office 694
established by the board of elections, or ; 695
(b) Submitting a voter registration or change of address 696
or change of name form in person, through another person, or by 697
mail at the office of the secretary of state or at the office of 698
a any board of elections. A registered elector may also change 699
the elector's registration ; 700
(c) Submitting the required information to the bureau of 701
motor vehicles, department of medicaid, or to a designated 702
agency in the manner directed by the bureau, department, or by 703
the designated agency, as applicable; 704
(d) Being registered or having the elector's registration 705
updated through the automatic voter registration system under 706
section 3503.11 of the Revised Code; 707
(e) Submitting an application through the online voter 708
registration system under section 3503.20 of the Revised Code; 709
(f) Submitting a voter registration or change of address 710
or change of name form in person to the election officials on 711
election day at any polling place where the elector is eligible 712
to vote, in the manner provided under section 3503.16 of the 713
Revised Code. 714
(2) Any state or local office of a designated agency, a 715
public high school or vocational school, a public library, or 716
the office of a county treasurer shall transmit any voter 717
registration application or change of registration form that it 718
receives to the board of elections of the county in which the 719
state or local office is located, within five days after 720
receiving the voter registration application or change of 721

H. B. No. 470 Page 26
As Introduced
registration form. The office of the registrar or any deputy 722
registrar of motor vehicles shall transmit any electronic voter 723
registration application or change of registration that it 724
receives to the secretary of state within twenty-four hours 725
after receiving it, and shall transmit any paper voter 726
registration application or change of registration form that it 727
receives to the board of elections of the county in which the 728
office of the registrar or deputy registrar is located within 729
five days after receiving the voter registration application or 730
change of registration form, as required under section 3503.11 731
of the Revised Code. 732
(3)(a) An otherwise valid voter registration application 733
that is returned to the appropriate office other than by mail 734
must be received by a state or local office of a designated 735
agency, the office of the registrar or any deputy registrar of 736
motor vehicles, a public high school or vocational school, a 737
public library, the office of a county treasurer, the office of 738
the secretary of state, or the office of a board of elections no 739
later than the thirtieth day preceding a primary, special, or 740
general election for the person to qualify as an elector 741
eligible to vote at that election. An otherwise valid 742
registration application received after that day entitles the 743
elector to vote at all subsequent elections. 744
(b) A person who is eligible to register to vote and has 745
submitted information to the bureau of motor vehicles or 746
department of medicaid under section 3503.11 of the Revised Code 747
in order to be registered to vote is considered to be registered 748
to vote upon submitting that information to the bureau or 749
department. The person shall be eligible to vote at the next 750
election that occurs within the time frame required for a person 751
to be registered to vote. 752

H. B. No. 470 Page 27
As Introduced
(4) Any state or local office of a designated agency, the 753
office of the registrar or any deputy registrar of motor 754
vehicles, a public high school or vocational school, a public 755
library, or the office of a county treasurer shall date stamp a 756
registration application or change of name or change of address 757
form it receives using a date stamp that does not disclose the 758
identity of the state or local office that receives the 759
registration. 760
(5) Voter registration applications, if otherwise valid, 761
that are returned by mail to the office of the secretary of 762
state or to the office of a board of elections must be 763
postmarked no later than the thirtieth day preceding a primary, 764
special, or general election in order for the person to qualify 765
as an elector eligible to vote at that election. If an otherwise 766
valid voter registration application that is returned by mail 767
does not bear a postmark or a legible postmark, the registration 768
shall be valid for that election if received by the office of 769
the secretary of state or the office of a board of elections no 770
later than twenty-five days preceding any special, primary, or 771
general election. 772
(B)(1) Any person may apply in person, by telephone, by 773
mail, or through another person for voter registration forms to 774
the office of the secretary of state or the office of a board of 775
elections. An individual who is eligible to vote as a uniformed 776
services voter or an overseas voter in accordance with 42 52 777
U.S.C. 1973ff-6 20310 also may apply for voter registration 778
forms by electronic means to the office of the secretary of 779
state or to the board of elections of the county in which the 780
person's voting residence is located pursuant to section 781
3503.191 of the Revised Code. 782

H. B. No. 470 Page 28
As Introduced
(2)(a) An applicant may return the applicant's completed 783
registration form in person or by mail to any state or local 784
office of a designated agency, to a public high school or 785
vocational school, to a public library, to the office of a 786
county treasurer, to the office of the secretary of state, or to 787
the office of a board of elections. An applicant who is eligible 788
to vote as a uniformed services voter or an overseas voter in 789
accordance with 42 52 U.S.C. 1973ff-6 20310 also may return the 790
applicant's completed voter registration form electronically to 791
the office of the secretary of state or to the board of 792
elections of the county in which the person's voting residence 793
is located pursuant to section 3503.191 of the Revised Code. 794
(b) Subject to division (B)(2)(c) of this section, an 795
applicant may return the applicant's completed registration form 796
through another person to any board of elections or the office 797
of the secretary of state. 798
(c) A person who receives compensation for registering a 799
voter shall return any registration form entrusted to that 800
person by an applicant to any board of elections or to the 801
office of the secretary of state. 802
(d) If a board of elections or the office of the secretary 803
of state receives a registration form under division (B)(2)(b) 804
or (c) of this section before the thirtieth day before an 805
election, the board or the office of the secretary of state, as 806
applicable, shall forward the registration to the board of 807
elections of the county in which the applicant is seeking to 808
register to vote within ten days after receiving the 809
application. If a board of elections or the office of the 810
secretary of state receives a registration form under division 811
(B)(2)(b) or (c) of this section on or after the thirtieth day 812

H. B. No. 470 Page 29
As Introduced
before an election, the board or the office of the secretary of 813
state, as applicable, shall forward the registration to the 814
board of elections of the county in which the applicant is 815
seeking to register to vote within thirty days after that 816
election. 817
(C)(1) (C)(1)(a) A board of elections that receives a 818
voter registration application or change of address or change of 819
name form and is satisfied as to the truth of the statements 820
made in the registration form shall register the applicant or 821
update the elector's registration, as applicable, not later than 822
twenty business days after receiving the application, unless 823
that application is received during the thirty days immediately 824
preceding the day of an election. The board shall promptly 825
notify send the applicant in writing of each or elector an 826
acknowledgement notice that includes all of the following: 827
(a)(i) The applicant's registrationfact that the person 828
has been registered to vote or had the person's registration 829
updated, as applicable; 830
(b)(ii) The precinct in which the applicant person is to 831
vote; 832
(c)(iii) In bold type as follows: 833
"Voters must bring photo identification to the polls in 834
order to verify identity. Voters who do not provide photo 835
identification will still be able to vote by casting a 836
provisional ballot." 837
(iv) If the person was registered to vote or had the 838
person's registration updated through the automatic voter 839
registration system described in section 3503.11 of the Revised 840
Code, the process to cancel the person's registration or to 841

H. B. No. 470 Page 30
As Introduced
submit corrected registration information to the board of 842
elections. 843
The notification acknowledgement notice shall be sent by 844
nonforwardable mail. If the mail is returned to the board, it 845
shall investigate and cause the notification acknowledgement 846
notice to be delivered to the correct address. 847
(b) If the board of elections receives a voter 848
registration or change of address or change of name form that is 849
incomplete, the board shall send the applicant or elector an 850
acknowledgment notice informing the person of the information 851
necessary to complete or update the person's registration. 852
(2) If, after investigating as required under division (C) 853
(1)(C)(1)(a) of this section, the board is unable to verify the 854
voter's correct address, it shall cause the voter's name in the 855
official registration list and in the poll list or signature 856
pollbook to be marked to indicate that the voter's notification 857
was returned to the board. 858
At the first election at which a voter whose name has been 859
so marked appears to vote, the voter shall be required to vote 860
by provisional ballot under section 3505.181 of the Revised 861
Code. If the provisional ballot is counted pursuant to division 862
(B)(3) of section 3505.183 of the Revised Code, the board shall 863
correct that voter's registration, if needed, and shall remove 864
the indication that the voter's notification was returned from 865
that voter's name on the official registration list and on the 866
poll list or signature pollbook. If the provisional ballot is 867
not counted pursuant to division (B)(4)(a)(i), (v), or (vi) of 868
section 3505.183 of the Revised Code, the voter's registration 869
shall be canceled. The board shall notify the voter by United 870
States mail of the cancellation. 871

H. B. No. 470 Page 31
As Introduced
(3) If a notice of the disposition of an otherwise valid 872
registration application is sent by nonforwardable mail and is 873
returned undelivered, the person shall be registered as provided 874
in division (C)(2) of this section and sent a confirmation 875
notice by forwardable mail. If the person fails to respond to 876
the confirmation notice, update the person's registration, or 877
vote by provisional ballot as provided in division (C)(2) of 878
this section in any election during the period of two federal 879
elections subsequent to the mailing of the confirmation notice, 880
the person's registration shall be canceled. 881
Sec. 3503.21. (A) The A voter registration of a registered 882
elector shall be canceled upon the occurrence of any of the 883
following: 884
(1) The filing by a registered elector of a written 885
request with a board of elections or the secretary of state, on 886
a form prescribed by the secretary of state and signed by the 887
elector, that the registration be canceled. The filing of such a 888
request does not prohibit an otherwise qualified elector from 889
reregistering to vote at any time. 890
(2) The filing of a notice of the death of a registered 891
elector as provided in section 3503.18 of the Revised Code; 892
(3) The filing with the board of elections of a certified 893
copy of the death certificate of a registered elector by the 894
deceased elector's spouse, parent, or child, by the 895
administrator of the deceased elector's estate, or by the 896
executor of the deceased elector's will; 897
(4) The conviction of the registered elector of a felony 898
under the laws of this state, any other state, or the United 899
States as provided in section 2961.01 of the Revised Code; 900

H. B. No. 470 Page 32
As Introduced
(5) The adjudication of incompetency of the registered 901
elector for the purpose of voting as provided in section 902
5122.301 of the Revised Code; 903
(6) The change of residence of the registered elector to a 904
location outside the county of registration in accordance with 905
division (B) of this sectionstate; 906
(7) The failure of the registered elector, after having 907
been mailed a confirmation notice, to do either of the 908
following: 909
(a) Respond to such a notice and vote at least once during 910
a period of four consecutive years, which period shall include 911
two general federal elections; 912
(b) Update the elector's registration and vote at least 913
once during a period of four consecutive years, which period 914
shall include two general federal elections. 915
(8) The declination of an elector who has been registered 916
to vote under section 3503.11 of the Revised Code, as described 917
in division (C)(3)(b) of that section; 918
(9) The receipt by the board of elections of a 919
cancellation notice or request pursuant to section 111.44 of the 920
Revised Code. 921
(B)(1) The secretary of state shall prescribe procedures 922
to identify and cancel the registration in a prior county of 923
residence of any registrant who changes the registrant's voting 924
residence to a location outside the registrant's current county 925
of registration. Any procedures prescribed in this division 926
shall be uniform and nondiscriminatory, and shall comply with 927
the Voting Rights Act of 1965. The secretary of state may 928
prescribe procedures under this division that include the use of 929

H. B. No. 470 Page 33
As Introduced
the national change of address service provided by the United 930
States postal system through its licensees. Any program so 931
prescribed shall be completed not later than ninety days prior 932
to the date of any primary or general election for federal 933
office. 934
(2) The registration of any elector identified as having 935
changed the elector's voting residence to a location outside the 936
elector's current county of registration shall not be canceled 937
unless the registrant is sent a confirmation notice on a form 938
prescribed by the secretary of state and the registrant fails to 939
respond to the confirmation notice or otherwise update the 940
registration and fails to vote in any election during the period 941
of two federal elections subsequent to the mailing of the 942
confirmation notice. 943
(C)(B) The registration of a registered elector shall not 944
be canceled except as provided in this section, section 111.44 945
of the Revised Code, division (Q) of section 3501.05 of the 946
Revised Code, division (C)(3)(b) of section 3503.11 of the 947
Revised Code, division (C)(2) of section 3503.19 of the Revised 948
Code, or division (C) of section 3503.24 of the Revised Code. 949
(D) Boards of elections shall send their voter 950
registration information to the secretary of state as required 951
under section 3503.15 of the Revised Code. The secretary of 952
state may prescribe by rule adopted pursuant to section 111.15 953
of the Revised Code the format in which the boards of elections 954
must send that information to the secretary of state. In the 955
first quarter of each year, the secretary of state shall send 956
the information to the national change of address service 957
described in division (B) of this section and request that 958
service to provide the secretary of state with a list of any 959

H. B. No. 470 Page 34
As Introduced
voters sent by the secretary of state who have moved within the 960
last twelve months. The secretary of state shall transmit to 961
each appropriate board of elections whatever lists the secretary 962
of state receives from that service. The board shall send a 963
notice to each person on the list transmitted by the secretary 964
of state requesting confirmation of the person's change of 965
address, together with a postage prepaid, preaddressed return 966
envelope containing a form on which the voter may verify or 967
correct the change of address information. 968
(E) (C) The registration of a registered elector described 969
in division (A)(7) or (B)(2) of this section shall be canceled 970
not later than one hundred twenty days after the date of the 971
second general federal election in which the elector fails to 972
vote or not later than one hundred twenty days after the 973
expiration of the four-year period in which the elector fails to 974
vote or respond to a confirmation notice, whichever is later. 975
(F)(1) (D)(1) When a registration is canceled pursuant to 976
division (A)(2) or (3) of this section, the applicable board of 977
elections shall send a written notice, on a form prescribed by 978
the secretary of state, to the address at which the elector was 979
registered, informing the recipient that the elector's 980
registration has been canceled, of the reason for the 981
cancellation, and that if the cancellation was made in error, 982
the elector may contact the board of elections to correct the 983
error. 984
(2) If the elector's registration is canceled pursuant to 985
division (A)(2) or (3) of this section in error, it shall be 986
restored and treated as though it were never canceled. 987
Sec. 3503.28. (A) The secretary of state shall develop an 988
information brochure regarding voter registration. The brochure 989

H. B. No. 470 Page 35
As Introduced
shall include, but is not limited to, all of the following 990
information: 991
(1) The applicable deadlines for registering to vote or 992
for returning submitting an applicant's completed registration 993
formapplication; 994
(2) The applicable deadline for returning an applicant's 995
completed registration form if the person returning the form is 996
being compensated for registering voters; 997
(3) The locations to and manner in which a person may 998
return an applicant's completed registration formregister or be 999
registered to vote; 1000
(4) The location to which a person who is compensated for 1001
registering voters may return an applicant's completed 1002
registration form; 1003
(5) The registration and affirmation requirements 1004
applicable to persons who are compensated for registering voters 1005
under section 3503.29 of the Revised Code; 1006
(6) The manner in which a person may decline to be 1007
registered to vote under the automatic voter registration system 1008
described in section 3503.11 of the Revised Code; 1009
(7) A notice, which shall be written in bold type, stating 1010
as follows: 1011
"Voters must bring photo identification to the polls in 1012
order to verify identity. Voters who do not provide photo 1013
identification will still be able to vote by casting a 1014
provisional ballot." 1015
(B) Except as otherwise provided in division (D) of this 1016
section, a board of elections, designated agency, public high 1017

H. B. No. 470 Page 36
As Introduced
school, public vocational school, public library, office of a 1018
county treasurer, or deputy registrar of motor vehicles shall 1019
distribute a copy of the brochure developed under division (A) 1020
of this section to any person who requests more than two voter 1021
registration forms at one time. 1022
(C)(1) The secretary of state shall provide the 1023
information required to be included in the brochure developed 1024
under division (A) of this section to any person who prints a 1025
voter registration form that is made available on a web site of 1026
the office of the secretary of state. 1027
(2) If a board of elections operates and maintains a web 1028
site, the board shall provide the information required to be 1029
included in the brochure developed under division (A) of this 1030
section to any person who prints a voter registration form that 1031
is made available on that web site. 1032
(D) A board of elections shall not be required to 1033
distribute a copy of a brochure under division (B) of this 1034
section to any of the following officials or employees who are 1035
requesting more than two voter registration forms at one time in 1036
the course of the official's or employee's normal duties: 1037
(1) An election official; 1038
(2) A county treasurer; 1039
(3) A deputy registrar of motor vehicles; 1040
(4) An employee of a designated agency; 1041
(5) An employee of a public high school; 1042
(6) An employee of a public vocational school; 1043
(7) An employee of a public library; 1044

H. B. No. 470 Page 37
As Introduced
(8) An employee of the office of a county treasurer; 1045
(9) An employee of the bureau of motor vehicles; 1046
(10) An employee of a deputy registrar of motor vehicles; 1047
(11) An employee of an election official. 1048
(E) As used in this section, "registering voters" includes 1049
any effort, for compensation, to provide voter registration 1050
forms or to assist persons in completing or returning those 1051
forms. 1052
Sec. 3503.30. (A) When by mistake a qualified elector has 1053
caused himselfthe elector to be registered in a precinct which 1054
was that is not histhe elector's place of residence, the board 1055
of elections, on full and satisfactory proof that such error was 1056
committed by mistake, may, on histhe elector's personal 1057
application and proof of histhe elector's true residence, 1058
correct histhe elector's registration form. The board may 1059
correct all errors occurring in the registration of electors 1060
when it finds that the errors subject to correction were not of 1061
fraudulent intent. 1062
(B) When by mistake a qualified elector has been 1063
registered under section 3503.11 of the Revised Code in a 1064
precinct or under a name that is not the elector's place of 1065
residence or name, the board of elections, upon proof of the 1066
elector's true residence or name, as applicable, shall correct 1067
the elector's registration form. If the elector casts a 1068
provisional ballot because the elector's registration has been 1069
updated erroneously under that section, the elector's 1070
provisional ballot shall be eligible to be counted, as described 1071
in division (E) of section 3505.183 of the Revised Code. 1072
Sec. 3503.33. (A) If an elector applying for registration 1073

H. B. No. 470 Page 38
As Introduced
is already registered in another state or in another county 1074
within this state, the elector shall declare this fact to on the 1075
registration officer and shall sign form, which shall operate as 1076
an authorization to cancel the previous registration on a form 1077
prescribed by the secretary of state. 1078
(B) When the board of elections registers a person to vote 1079
or updates a person's registration under section 3503.11 of the 1080
Revised Code, if the board is aware of the person's previous 1081
residence address and that address is located in another state 1082
or in another county within this state, the board shall create a 1083
notice to cancel the previous registration for the purpose of 1084
complying with division (C) of this section. 1085
(C) The director of the board of elections shall mail all 1086
such authorizations and notices described in division (A) or (B) 1087
of this section to the board of elections or comparable agency 1088
of the proper state and county. In the case of a notice 1089
described in division (B) of this section, the board shall 1090
include with the notice a copy of the elector's most recent 1091
registration form. Upon the receipt of this authorization from 1092
the forwarding county, the director of a board of elections in 1093
Ohio, upon a comparison of the elector's signature with the 1094
elector's signature as it appears on the registration files, 1095
shall remove the elector's registration from the files, and 1096
place it with the cancellation authorization in a separate file 1097
which shall be kept for a period of two calendar years. The 1098
The board shall notify the elector at the present address 1099
as shown on the cancellation authorization or notice that histhe 1100
elector's prior registration has been canceled. 1101
(D) If, after the cancellation of an elector's prior 1102
registration under division (C) of this section, the board of 1103

H. B. No. 470 Page 39
As Introduced
elections that sent the notice under division (B) of this 1104
section receives a declination to register or to update the 1105
elector's registration under section 3503.11 of the Revised 1106
Code, the board shall notify the board of elections or 1107
comparable agency to which the board sent the notice under 1108
division (B) of this section to restore the elector's previous 1109
registration and treat it as though it were never canceled. 1110
Sec. 3505.181. (A) All of the following individuals shall 1111
be permitted to cast a provisional ballot at an election: 1112
(1) An individual who declares that the individual is a 1113
registered voter in the precinct in which the individual desires 1114
to vote and that the individual is eligible to vote in an 1115
election, but the name of the individual does not appear on the 1116
official list of eligible voters for the precinct or an election 1117
official asserts that the individual is not eligible to vote; 1118
(2) An individual who does not have or is unable to 1119
provide photo identification to the election officials; 1120
(3) An individual whose name in the poll list or signature 1121
pollbook has been marked under section 3509.09 or 3511.13 of the 1122
Revised Code as having requested an absent voter's ballot or a 1123
uniformed services or overseas absent voter's ballot for that 1124
election and who appears to vote at the polling place; 1125
(4) An individual whose name in the poll list or signature 1126
pollbook has been marked because the individual's notification 1127
of registration has been returned undelivered to the board of 1128
elections and whose name in the official registration list and 1129
in the poll list or signature pollbook has been marked under 1130
division (C)(2) of section 3503.19 of the Revised Code; 1131
(5) An individual who has been successfully challenged 1132

H. B. No. 470 Page 40
As Introduced
under section 3505.20 or 3513.20 of the Revised Code; 1133
(6) An individual who changes the individual's name and 1134
remains within the precinct without providing proof of that name 1135
change under division (B)(1)(b) of section 3503.16 of the 1136
Revised Code, moves from one precinct to another within a 1137
county, moves from one precinct to another and changes the 1138
individual's name, or moves from one county to another within 1139
the state, and completes and signs the required forms and 1140
statements under division (B) or (C) of section 3503.16 of the 1141
Revised Code; 1142
(7) An individual whose signature, in the opinion of the 1143
precinct officers under section 3505.22 of the Revised Code, is 1144
not that of the person who signed that name in the registration 1145
forms. 1146
(B) An individual who is eligible to cast a provisional 1147
ballot under division (A) of this section shall be permitted to 1148
cast a provisional ballot as follows: 1149
(1) An election official at the polling place shall notify 1150
the individual that the individual may cast a provisional ballot 1151
in that election. 1152
(2) Except as otherwise provided in division (F) of this 1153
section, the individual shall complete and execute a written 1154
affirmation before an election official at the polling place 1155
stating that the individual is both of the following: 1156
(a) A registered voter in the precinct in which the 1157
individual desires to vote; 1158
(b) Eligible to vote in that election. 1159
(3) An election official at the polling place shall 1160

H. B. No. 470 Page 41
As Introduced
transmit the ballot cast by the individual and the voter 1161
information contained in the written affirmation executed by the 1162
individual under division (B)(2) of this section to an 1163
appropriate local election official for verification under 1164
division (B)(4) of this section. 1165
(4) If the appropriate local election official to whom the 1166
ballot or voter or address information is transmitted under 1167
division (B)(3) of this section determines that the individual 1168
is eligible to vote, the individual's provisional ballot shall 1169
be counted as a vote in that election. 1170
(5)(a) At the time that an individual casts a provisional 1171
ballot, the appropriate local election official shall give the 1172
individual written information that states that any individual 1173
who casts a provisional ballot will be able to ascertain under 1174
the system established under division (B)(5)(b) of this section 1175
whether the vote was counted, and, if the vote was not counted, 1176
the reason that the vote was not counted. 1177
(b) The appropriate state or local election official shall 1178
establish a free access system, in the form of a toll-free 1179
telephone number, that any individual who casts a provisional 1180
ballot may access to discover whether the vote of that 1181
individual was counted, and, if the vote was not counted, the 1182
reason that the vote was not counted. The free access system 1183
established under this division also shall provide to an 1184
individual whose provisional ballot was not counted information 1185
explaining how that individual may contact the board of 1186
elections to register to vote or to resolve problems with the 1187
individual's voter registration. 1188
The appropriate state or local election official shall 1189
establish and maintain reasonable procedures necessary to 1190

H. B. No. 470 Page 42
As Introduced
protect the security, confidentiality, and integrity of personal 1191
information collected, stored, or otherwise used by the free 1192
access system established under this division. The system shall 1193
permit an individual only to gain access to information about 1194
the individual's own provisional ballot. 1195
(6) If, at the time that an individual casts a provisional 1196
ballot, the individual provides photo identification, the 1197
individual shall record the type of identification provided on 1198
the provisional ballot affirmation and, if the individual 1199
provides an Ohio driver's license, state identification card, or 1200
interim identification document, the individual also shall write 1201
the individual's driver's license or state identification card 1202
number on the provisional ballot affirmation. 1203
(7)(a) For a provisional ballot to be eligible to be 1204
counted when it is cast by an individual who does not have photo 1205
identification because the individual has a religious objection 1206
to being photographed, the individual shall complete an 1207
affidavit of religious objection under section 3505.19 of the 1208
Revised Code. The election officials shall attach the affidavit 1209
to the individual's provisional ballot envelope. If the 1210
individual does not complete the affidavit at the time of 1211
casting the provisional ballot, the individual may appear at the 1212
office of the board of elections within four days after the day 1213
of the election and complete the affidavit. 1214
(b) For a provisional ballot to be eligible to be counted 1215
when it is cast by any other individual who does not have or is 1216
unable to provide photo identification to the election 1217
officials, the individual who cast that ballot, within four days 1218
after the day of the election, shall appear at the office of the 1219
board of elections and provide photo identification. 1220

H. B. No. 470 Page 43
As Introduced
(8) For a provisional ballot cast by an individual who has 1221
been successfully challenged under section 3505.20 of the 1222
Revised Code to be eligible to be counted, the individual who 1223
cast that ballot, within four days after the day of that 1224
election, shall provide to the board of elections any 1225
identification or other documentation required to be provided by 1226
the applicable challenge questions asked of that individual 1227
under section 3505.20 of the Revised Code. 1228
(C)(1) If an individual declares that the individual is 1229
eligible to vote in a precinct other than the precinct in which 1230
the individual desires to vote, or if, upon review of the 1231
precinct voting location guide using the residential street 1232
address provided by the individual, an election official at the 1233
precinct at which the individual desires to vote determines that 1234
the individual is not eligible to vote in that precinct, the 1235
election official shall direct the individual to the precinct 1236
and polling place in which the individual appears to be eligible 1237
to vote, explain that the individual may cast a provisional 1238
ballot at the current location but the ballot or a portion of 1239
the ballot will not be counted if it is cast in the wrong 1240
precinct, and provide the telephone number of the board of 1241
elections in case the individual has additional questions. 1242
(2) If the individual refuses to travel to the correct 1243
precinct or to the office of the board of elections to cast a 1244
ballot, the individual shall be permitted to vote a provisional 1245
ballot at that precinct in accordance with division (B) of this 1246
section. If the individual is in the correct polling location 1247
for the precinct in which the individual is registered and 1248
eligible to vote, the election official shall complete and sign, 1249
under penalty of election falsification, a form that includes 1250
all of the following, and attach the form to the individual's 1251

H. B. No. 470 Page 44
As Introduced
provisional ballot affirmation: 1252
(a) The name or number of the individual's correct 1253
precinct; 1254
(b) A statement that the election official instructed the 1255
individual to travel to the correct precinct to vote; 1256
(c) A statement that the election official informed the 1257
individual that casting a provisional ballot in the wrong 1258
precinct would result in all or a portion of the votes on the 1259
ballot being rejected; 1260
(d) The name or number of the precinct in which the 1261
individual is casting a provisional ballot; and 1262
(e) The name of the polling location in which the 1263
individual is casting a provisional ballot. 1264
(D) The appropriate local election official shall cause 1265
voting information to be publicly posted at each polling place 1266
on the day of each election. 1267
(E) As used in this section and sections 3505.182 and 1268
3505.183 of the Revised Code: 1269
(1) "Precinct voting location guide" means either of the 1270
following: 1271
(a) An electronic or paper record that lists the correct 1272
precinct and polling place for either each specific residential 1273
street address in the county or the range of residential street 1274
addresses located in each neighborhood block in the county; 1275
(b) Any other method that a board of elections creates 1276
that allows a precinct election official or any elector who is 1277
at a polling place in that county to determine the correct 1278

H. B. No. 470 Page 45
As Introduced
precinct and polling place of any qualified elector who resides 1279
in the county. 1280
(2) "Voting information" means all of the following: 1281
(a) A sample version of the ballot that will be used for 1282
that election; 1283
(b) Information regarding the date of the election and the 1284
hours during which polling places will be open; 1285
(c) Instructions on how to vote, including how to cast a 1286
vote and how to cast a provisional ballot; 1287
(d) Instructions for mail-in registrants and first-time 1288
voters under applicable federal and state laws; 1289
(e) General information on voting rights under applicable 1290
federal and state laws, including information on the right of an 1291
individual to cast a provisional ballot and instructions on how 1292
to contact the appropriate officials if these rights are alleged 1293
to have been violated; 1294
(f) General information on federal and state laws 1295
regarding prohibitions against acts of fraud and 1296
misrepresentation. 1297
(F) Nothing in this section or section 3505.183 of the 1298
Revised Code is in derogation of section 3505.24 of the Revised 1299
Code, which permits a blind, disabled, or illiterate elector to 1300
receive assistance in the marking of the elector's ballot by two 1301
precinct election officials of different political parties. A 1302
blind, disabled, or illiterate elector may receive assistance in 1303
marking that elector's provisional ballot and in completing the 1304
required affirmation in the same manner as an elector may 1305
receive assistance on the day of an election under that section. 1306

H. B. No. 470 Page 46
As Introduced
Sec. 3505.183. (A) When the ballot boxes are delivered to 1307
the board of elections from the precincts, the board shall 1308
separate the provisional ballot envelopes from the rest of the 1309
ballots. Teams of employees of the board consisting of one 1310
member of each major political party shall place the sealed 1311
provisional ballot envelopes in a secure location within the 1312
office of the board. The sealed provisional ballot envelopes 1313
shall remain in that secure location until the validity of those 1314
ballots is determined under division (B) of this section. While 1315
the provisional ballot is stored in that secure location, and 1316
prior to the counting of the provisional ballots, if the board 1317
receives information regarding the validity of a specific 1318
provisional ballot under division (B) of this section, the board 1319
may note, on the sealed provisional ballot envelope for that 1320
ballot, whether the ballot is valid and entitled to be counted. 1321
(B)(1) To determine whether a provisional ballot is valid 1322
and entitled to be counted, the board shall examine its records 1323
and determine whether the individual who cast the provisional 1324
ballot is registered and eligible to vote in the applicable 1325
election. The board shall examine the information contained in 1326
the written affirmation executed by the individual who cast the 1327
provisional ballot under division (B)(2) of section 3505.181 of 1328
the Revised Code. The following information shall be included in 1329
the written affirmation in order for the provisional ballot to 1330
be eligible to be counted: 1331
(a) The individual's printed name, signature, date of 1332
birth, and current address; 1333
(b) A statement that the individual is a registered voter 1334
in the precinct in which the provisional ballot is being voted; 1335
(c) A statement that the individual is eligible to vote in 1336

H. B. No. 470 Page 47
As Introduced
the election in which the provisional ballot is being voted. 1337
(2) In addition to the information required to be included 1338
in an affirmation under division (B)(1) of this section, in 1339
determining whether a provisional ballot is valid and entitled 1340
to be counted, the board also shall examine any additional 1341
information for determining ballot validity provided by the 1342
provisional voter on the affirmation, provided by the 1343
provisional voter to an election official under section 3505.182 1344
of the Revised Code, or provided to the board of elections 1345
during the four days after the day of the election under 1346
division (B)(7) or (8) of section 3505.181 of the Revised Code, 1347
to assist the board in determining the individual's eligibility 1348
to vote. 1349
(3) If, in examining a provisional ballot affirmation and 1350
additional information under divisions (B)(1) and (2) of this 1351
section and comparing the information required under division 1352
(B)(1) of this section with the individual's information in the 1353
statewide voter registration database, the board determines that 1354
all of the following apply, the provisional ballot envelope 1355
shall be opened, and the ballot shall be placed in a ballot box 1356
to be counted: 1357
(a) The individual named on the affirmation is properly 1358
registered to vote. 1359
(b) The Except as otherwise provided in divisions (D) and 1360
(E) of this section, the individual named on the affirmation is 1361
eligible to cast a ballot in the precinct and for the election 1362
in which the individual cast the provisional ballot. 1363
(c) The individual provided all of the information 1364
required under division (B)(1) of this section in the 1365

H. B. No. 470 Page 48
As Introduced
affirmation that the individual executed at the time the 1366
individual cast the provisional ballot. 1367
(d) One of the following applies: 1368
(i) The individual provided photo identification at the 1369
time of casting the provisional ballot or appeared at the office 1370
of the board within four days after the day of the election and 1371
provided photo identification. If the individual provided the 1372
individual's Ohio driver's license or state identification card 1373
or an interim identification form, the individual provided the 1374
individual's driver's license number or state identification 1375
card number and the number is not different from the 1376
individual's driver's license number or state identification 1377
card number contained in the statewide voter registration 1378
database. 1379
(ii) The individual completed an affidavit of religious 1380
objection under section 3505.19 of the Revised Code at the time 1381
of casting the provisional ballot or at the office of the board 1382
within four days after the day of the election and the affidavit 1383
is valid under that section. 1384
(e) Except as otherwise provided in this division, the 1385
month and day of the individual's date of birth are not 1386
different from the day and month of the individual's date of 1387
birth contained in the statewide voter registration database. 1388
This division does not apply to an individual's 1389
provisional ballot if either of the following is true: 1390
(i) The individual's date of birth contained in the 1391
statewide voter registration database is January 1, 1800. 1392
(ii) The board of elections has found, by a vote of at 1393
least three of its members, that the individual has met all 1394

H. B. No. 470 Page 49
As Introduced
other requirements of division (B)(3) of this section. 1395
(f) The individual's current address is not different from 1396
the individual's address contained in the statewide voter 1397
registration database, unless the individual indicated that the 1398
individual is casting a provisional ballot because the 1399
individual has moved and has not submitted a notice of change of 1400
address, as described in division (A)(6) of section 3505.181 of 1401
the Revised Code, and except as otherwise provided in division 1402
(E) of this section. 1403
(g) If applicable, the individual provided any additional 1404
information required under division (B)(8) of section 3505.181 1405
of the Revised Code within four days after the day of the 1406
election. 1407
(4)(a) Except as otherwise provided in division divisions 1408
(D) and (E) of this section, if, in examining a provisional 1409
ballot affirmation and additional information under divisions 1410
(B)(1) and (2) of this section and comparing the information 1411
required under division (B)(1) of this section with the 1412
individual's information in the statewide voter registration 1413
database, the board determines that any of the following 1414
applies, the provisional ballot envelope shall not be opened, 1415
and the ballot shall not be counted: 1416
(i) The individual named on the affirmation is not 1417
qualified or is not properly registered to vote. 1418
(ii) The individual named on the affirmation is not 1419
eligible to cast a ballot in the precinct or for the election in 1420
which the individual cast the provisional ballot. 1421
(iii) The individual did not provide all of the 1422
information required under division (B)(1) of this section in 1423

H. B. No. 470 Page 50
As Introduced
the affirmation that the individual executed at the time the 1424
individual cast the provisional ballot. 1425
(iv) The individual has already cast a ballot for the 1426
election in which the individual cast the provisional ballot. 1427
(v) If applicable, the individual did not provide any 1428
additional information required under division (B)(8) of section 1429
3505.181 of the Revised Code within four days after the day of 1430
the election. 1431
(vi) The individual failed to provide photo 1432
identification, to provide the individual's driver's license or 1433
state identification card number if the individual provided 1434
photo identification in the form of an Ohio driver's license or 1435
state identification card or an interim identification form, or 1436
to complete an affidavit of religious objection. 1437
(vii) The individual failed to execute an affirmation 1438
under division (B) of section 3505.181 of the Revised Code. 1439
(viii) The individual provided photo identification in the 1440
form of an Ohio driver's license or state identification card or 1441
an interim identification form and the driver's license number 1442
or state identification card number the individual provided is 1443
different from the individual's driver's license number or state 1444
identification card number contained in the statewide voter 1445
registration database. 1446
(ix) The individual completed an affidavit of religious 1447
objection under section 3505.19 of the Revised Code, but the 1448
affidavit is not valid under that section. 1449
(x) Except as otherwise provided in this division, the 1450
month and day of the individual's date of birth are different 1451
from the day and month of the individual's date of birth 1452

H. B. No. 470 Page 51
As Introduced
contained in the statewide voter registration database. 1453
This division does not apply to an individual's 1454
provisional ballot if either of the following is true: 1455
(I) The individual's date of birth contained in the 1456
statewide voter registration database is January 1, 1800. 1457
(II) The board of elections has found, by a vote of at 1458
least three of its members, that the individual has met all of 1459
the requirements of division (B)(3) of this section, other than 1460
the requirements of division (B)(3)(e) of this section. 1461
(xi) The individual's current address is different from 1462
the individual's address contained in the statewide voter 1463
registration database, unless the individual indicated that the 1464
individual is casting a provisional ballot because the 1465
individual has moved and has not submitted a notice of change of 1466
address, as described in division (A)(6) of section 3505.181 of 1467
the Revised Code. 1468
(b) If, in examining a provisional ballot affirmation and 1469
additional information under divisions (B)(1) and (2) of this 1470
section and comparing the information required under division 1471
(B)(1) of this section with the individual's information in the 1472
statewide voter registration database, the board is unable to 1473
determine either of the following, the provisional ballot 1474
envelope shall not be opened, and the ballot shall not be 1475
counted: 1476
(i) Whether the individual named on the affirmation is 1477
qualified or properly registered to vote; 1478
(ii) Whether the individual named on the affirmation is 1479
eligible to cast a ballot in the precinct or for the election in 1480
which the individual cast the provisional ballot. 1481

H. B. No. 470 Page 52
As Introduced
(C) For each provisional ballot rejected under division 1482
(B)(4) of this section, the board shall record the name of the 1483
provisional voter who cast the ballot, the identification number 1484
of the provisional ballot envelope, the names of the election 1485
officials who determined the validity of that ballot, the date 1486
and time that the determination was made, and the reason that 1487
the ballot was not counted, unless the board has already 1488
recorded that information in another database. 1489
(D)(1) If an individual cast a provisional ballot in a 1490
precinct in which the individual is not registered and eligible 1491
to vote, but in the correct polling location for the precinct in 1492
which the individual is registered and eligible to vote, and the 1493
election official failed to direct the individual to the correct 1494
precinct, the individual's ballot shall be remade under division 1495
(D)(2) of this section. The election official shall be deemed to 1496
have directed the individual to the correct precinct if the 1497
election official correctly completed the form described in 1498
division (C)(2) of section 3505.181 of the Revised Code. 1499
(2) A board of elections that remakes a provisional ballot 1500
under division (D)(1) of this section shall remake the 1501
provisional ballot on a ballot for the appropriate precinct to 1502
reflect the offices, questions, and issues for which the 1503
individual was eligible to cast a ballot and for which the 1504
individual attempted to cast a provisional ballot. The remade 1505
ballot shall be counted for each office, question, and issue for 1506
which the individual was eligible to vote. 1507
(3) If Except as otherwise provided in division (E)(2) of 1508
this section, if an individual cast a provisional ballot in a 1509
precinct in which the individual is not registered and eligible 1510
to vote and in the incorrect polling location for the precinct 1511

H. B. No. 470 Page 53
As Introduced
in which the individual is registered and eligible to vote, the 1512
provisional ballot envelope shall not be opened, and the ballot 1513
shall not be counted. 1514
(E) Provisional (E)(1) If the board determines that a 1515
provisional ballot is not eligible to be counted under this 1516
section because the individual's address provided on the 1517
provisional ballot affirmation is different from the address 1518
contained in the statewide voter registration database, because 1519
the individual's name and signature provided on the provisional 1520
ballot affirmation are different from the name and signature 1521
contained in the statewide voter registration database, or both, 1522
and both of the following are true, the board shall correct the 1523
individual's voter registration record to reflect the 1524
information provided in the provisional ballot affirmation, and 1525
the provisional ballot nonetheless shall be eligible to be 1526
counted: 1527
(a) The individual's voter registration was most recently 1528
updated through the automatic voter registration system 1529
described in section 3503.11 of the Revised Code and not at the 1530
request of the individual or using information the individual 1531
submitted to the board of elections or the secretary of state. 1532
(b) The individual's voter registration correctly 1533
reflected the individual's address, name, and signature, as 1534
provided on the provisional ballot affirmation, immediately 1535
before that update occurred. 1536
(2) If an individual who cast a provisional ballot that is 1537
eligible to be counted under division (E)(1) of this section 1538
cast that ballot in the precinct indicated by the individual's 1539
voter registration record as updated through the automatic voter 1540
registration system, and not in the precinct in which the 1541

H. B. No. 470 Page 54
As Introduced
individual resides, the board shall remake the provisional 1542
ballot on a ballot for the precinct in which the individual 1543
resides to reflect the offices, questions, and issues for which 1544
the individual was eligible to cast a ballot and for which the 1545
individual attempted to cast a provisional ballot. The remade 1546
ballot shall be counted for each office, question, and issue for 1547
which the individual was eligible to vote. 1548
(F) Provisional ballots that are rejected under division 1549
(B)(4) of this section shall not be counted but shall be 1550
preserved in their provisional ballot envelopes unopened until 1551
the time provided by section 3505.31 of the Revised Code for the 1552
destruction of all other ballots used at the election for which 1553
ballots were provided, at which time they shall be destroyed. 1554
(F) (G) Provisional ballots that the board determines are 1555
eligible to be counted under division (B)(3) or (D) of this 1556
section shall be counted in the same manner as provided for 1557
other ballots under section 3505.27 of the Revised Code. No 1558
provisional ballots shall be counted in a particular county 1559
until the board determines the eligibility to be counted of all 1560
provisional ballots cast in that county under division (B) of 1561
this section for that election. Observers, as provided in 1562
section 3505.21 of the Revised Code, may be present at all times 1563
that the board is determining the eligibility of provisional 1564
ballots to be counted and counting those provisional ballots 1565
determined to be eligible. No person shall recklessly disclose 1566
the count or any portion of the count of provisional ballots in 1567
such a manner as to jeopardize the secrecy of any individual 1568
ballot. 1569
(G)(1) (H)(1) Except as otherwise provided in division (G) 1570
(2) (H)(2) of this section, nothing in this section shall 1571

H. B. No. 470 Page 55
As Introduced
prevent a board of elections from examining provisional ballot 1572
affirmations and additional information under divisions (B)(1) 1573
and (2) of this section to determine the eligibility of 1574
provisional ballots to be counted during the seven days after 1575
the day of an election. 1576
(2) A board of elections shall not examine the provisional 1577
ballot affirmation and additional information under divisions 1578
(B)(1) and (2) of this section of any provisional ballot cast by 1579
an individual who must provide photo identification, complete an 1580
affidavit of religious objection, or provide additional 1581
information to the board of elections under division (B)(7) or 1582
(8) of section 3505.181 of the Revised Code for the board to 1583
determine the individual's eligibility until the individual does 1584
so or until the eighth day after the day of the election, 1585
whichever is earlier. 1586
Sec. 3599.11. (A) No (A)(1) Subject to division (A)(2) of 1587
this section, no person shall knowingly do any of the following: 1588
(a) Knowingly register or make application or attempt to 1589
register in a precinct in which the person is not a qualified 1590
voter; or knowingly 1591
(b) Knowingly aid or abet any person to so register; or 1592
attempt 1593
(c) Knowingly attempt to register or knowingly induce or 1594
attempt to induce any person to so register; or knowingly 1595
(d) Knowingly impersonate another or write or assume the 1596
name of another, real or fictitious, in registering or 1597
attempting to register; or by 1598
(e) By false statement or other unlawful means, knowingly 1599
procure, aid, or attempt to procure the erasure or striking out 1600

H. B. No. 470 Page 56
As Introduced
on the register or duplicate list of the name of a qualified 1601
elector therein; or knowingly 1602
(f) Knowingly induce or attempt to induce a registrar or 1603
other election authority to refuse registration in a precinct to 1604
an elector thereof; or knowingly 1605
(g) Knowingly swear or affirm falsely upon a lawful 1606
examination by or before any registering officer; or make 1607
(h) Knowingly make, print, or issue any false or 1608
counterfeit certificate of registration or knowingly alter any 1609
certificate of registration. 1610
No person shall knowingly; 1611
(i) Knowingly register under more than one name or 1612
knowingly induce any person to so register. 1613
No person shall knowingly; 1614
(j) Knowingly make any false statement on any form for 1615
registration or change of registration or upon any application 1616
or return envelope for an absent voter's ballot. 1617
(2)(a) A person whose voter registration or 1618
preregistration or voter registration or preregistration update 1619
is processed through the automatic voter registration system 1620
described in section 3503.11 of the Revised Code and who is not 1621
a qualified voter or person eligible to preregister in the 1622
precinct or under the name indicated violates division (A)(1) of 1623
this section only if the person knowingly provides or attempts 1624
to provide false information with the intention of registering 1625
or preregistering or submitting a registration or 1626
preregistration update using that information. 1627
(b) A person who aids, abets, induces, or attempts to 1628

H. B. No. 470 Page 57
As Introduced
induce another person to have the other person's voter 1629
registration or preregistration or voter registration or 1630
preregistration update processed through the automatic voter 1631
registration system described in section 3503.11 of the Revised 1632
Code when the other person is not a qualified voter or person 1633
eligible to preregister in the precinct or under the name 1634
indicated violates division (A)(1) of this section only if the 1635
person knowingly causes or attempts to cause the other person to 1636
be registered or preregistered to vote or to have the other 1637
person's registration or preregistration updated using 1638
information the person knows is false. 1639
(3) Whoever violates this division (A)(1) of this section 1640
is guilty of a felony of the fifth degree. 1641
(B)(1) No person who helps another person register outside 1642
an official voter registration place shall knowingly destroy, or 1643
knowingly help another person to destroy, any completed 1644
registration form. 1645
Whoever violates this division is guilty of election 1646
falsification, a felony of the fifth degree. 1647
(2)(a)(2) No person who helps another person register 1648
outside an official voter registration place shall knowingly 1649
fail to return cause any registration form entrusted to that 1650
person to be returned to any board of elections or the office of 1651
the secretary of state within ten days after that regsitration 1652
registration form is completed, or on or before the thirtieth 1653
day before the election, whichever day is earlier, unless the 1654
registration form is received by the person within twenty-four 1655
hours of the thirtieth day before the election, in which case 1656
the person shall return cause the registration form to be 1657
returned to any board of elections or the office of the 1658

H. B. No. 470 Page 58
As Introduced
secretary of state within ten days of its receipt. 1659
Whoever violates this division is guilty of election 1660
falsification, a felony of the fifth degree, unless the person 1661
has not previously been convicted of a violation of this 1662
division (B)(2)(a), (B)(2)(b), (C)(1), or (C)(2) of this 1663
section, the violation of this division does not cause any 1664
person to miss any voter registration deadline with regard to 1665
any election, and the number of voter registration forms that 1666
the violator has failed to properly return does not exceed 1667
forty-nine, in which case the violator is guilty of a 1668
misdemeanor of the first degree. 1669
(b) Subject to division (C)(2) of this section, no person 1670
who helps another person register outside an official 1671
registration place shall knowingly return any registration form 1672
entrusted to that person to any location other than any board of 1673
elections or the office of the secretary of state. 1674
Whoever violates this division is guilty of election 1675
falsification, a felony of the fifth degree, unless the person 1676
has not previously been convicted of a violation of division (B) 1677
(2)(a), (B)(2)(b), (C)(1), or (C)(2) of this section, the 1678
violation of this division does not cause any person to miss any 1679
voter registration deadline with regard to any election, and the 1680
number of voter registration forms that the violator has failed 1681
to properly return does not exceed forty-nine, in which case the 1682
violator is guilty of a misdemeanor of the first degree. 1683
(C)(1) No person who receives compensation for registering 1684
a voter shall knowingly fail to return any registration form 1685
entrusted to that person to any board of elections or the office 1686
of the secretary of state within ten days after that voter 1687
registration form is completed, or on or before the thirtieth 1688

H. B. No. 470 Page 59
As Introduced
day before the election, whichever is earlier, unless the 1689
registration form is received by the person within twenty-four 1690
hours of the thirtieth day before the election, in which case 1691
the person shall return the registration form to any board of 1692
elections or the office of the secrtary of state within ten days 1693
of its receipt. 1694
Whoever violates this division is guilty of election 1695
falsification, a felony of the fifth degree, unless the person 1696
has not previously been convicted of a violation of division (B) 1697
(2)(a), (B)(2)(b), (C)(1), or (C)(2) of this section, the 1698
violation of this division does not cause any person to miss any 1699
voter registration deadline with regard to any election, and the 1700
number of voter registration forms that the violator has failed 1701
to properly return does not exceed forty-nine, in which case the 1702
violator is guilty of a misdemeanor of the first degree. 1703
(2) No person who receives compensation for registering a 1704
voter shall knowingly return any registration form entrusted to 1705
that person to any location other than any board of elections or 1706
the office of the secretary of state. 1707
Whoever violates this division is guilty of election 1708
falsification, a felony of the fifth degree, unless the person 1709
has not previously been convicted of a violation of division (B) 1710
(2)(a), (B)(2)(b), (C)(1), or (C)(2) of this section, the 1711
violation of this division does not cause any person to miss any 1712
voter registration deadline with regard to any election, and the 1713
number of voter registration forms that the violator has failed 1714
to properly return does not exceed forty-nine, in which case the 1715
violator is guilty of a misdemeanor of the first degree. 1716
(D) As used in division (C) of this section, "registering 1717
a voter" includes any effort, for compensation, to provide voter 1718

H. B. No. 470 Page 60
As Introduced
registration forms or to assist persons in completing or 1719
returning those forms. 1720
Sec. 3599.18. (A) No election official, person assisting 1721
in the registration of electors, or police officer shall 1722
knowingly do any of the following: 1723
(1) Refuse, neglect, or unnecessarily delay, hinder, or 1724
prevent the registration of a qualified electorperson, who in a 1725
lawful manner applies for registration or who should be 1726
registered or have the person's registration updated under 1727
section 3503.11 of the Revised Code; 1728
(2) Enter or consent to the entry of a fictitious name on 1729
a voter registration list; 1730
(3) Alter the name on or remove or destroy the 1731
registration card or form of any qualified elector; 1732
(4) Neglect, unlawfully execute, or fail to execute any 1733
duty enjoined upon that person as an election official, person 1734
assisting in the registration of electors, or police officer. 1735
(B) Whoever violates division (A) of this section is 1736
guilty of a misdemeanor of the first degree. 1737
Sec. 4506.07. (A) An applicant for a commercial driver's 1738
license, restricted commercial driver's license, or a commercial 1739
driver's license temporary instruction permit, or a duplicate of 1740
such a license or permit, shall submit an application upon a 1741
form approved and furnished by the registrar of motor vehicles. 1742
Except as provided in section 4506.24 of the Revised Code in 1743
regard to a restricted commercial driver's license, the 1744
applicant shall sign the application which shall contain the 1745
following information: 1746

H. B. No. 470 Page 61
As Introduced
(1) The applicant's name, date of birth, social security 1747
account number, sex, general description including height, 1748
weight, and color of hair and eyes, current residence, duration 1749
of residence in this state, state of domicile, country of 1750
citizenship, and occupation; 1751
(2) Whether the applicant previously has been licensed to 1752
operate a commercial motor vehicle or any other type of motor 1753
vehicle in another state or a foreign jurisdiction and, if so, 1754
when, by what state, and whether the license or driving 1755
privileges currently are suspended or revoked in any 1756
jurisdiction, or the applicant otherwise has been disqualified 1757
from operating a commercial motor vehicle, or is subject to an 1758
out-of-service order issued under this chapter or any similar 1759
law of another state or a foreign jurisdiction and, if so, the 1760
date of, locations involved, and reason for the suspension, 1761
revocation, disqualification, or out-of-service order; 1762
(3) Whether the applicant has any physical or mental 1763
disability or disease that prevents the applicant from 1764
exercising reasonable and ordinary control over a motor vehicle 1765
while operating it upon a highway or is or has been subject to 1766
any condition resulting in episodic impairment of consciousness 1767
or loss of muscular control and, if so, the nature and extent of 1768
the disability, disease, or condition, and the names and 1769
addresses of the physicians, certified nurse-midwives if 1770
authorized as described in section 4723.438 of the Revised Code, 1771
clinical nurse specialists, or certified nurse practitioners 1772
attending the applicant; 1773
(4) Whether the applicant has obtained a medical 1774
examiner's certificate as required by this chapter and, 1775
beginning January 30, 2012, the applicant, prior to or at the 1776

H. B. No. 470 Page 62
As Introduced
time of applying, has self-certified to the registrar the 1777
applicable status of the applicant under division (A)(1) of 1778
section 4506.10 of the Revised Code; 1779
(5) Whether the applicant has pending a citation for 1780
violation of any motor vehicle law or ordinance except a parking 1781
violation and, if so, a description of the citation, the court 1782
having jurisdiction of the offense, and the date when the 1783
offense occurred; 1784
(6) If an applicant has not certified the applicant's 1785
willingness to make an anatomical gift under section 2108.05 of 1786
the Revised Code, whether the applicant wishes to certify 1787
willingness to make such an anatomical gift, which shall be 1788
given no consideration in the issuance of a license; 1789
(7) Whether the applicant has executed a valid durable 1790
power of attorney for health care pursuant to sections 1337.11 1791
to 1337.17 of the Revised Code or has executed a declaration 1792
governing the use or continuation, or the withholding or 1793
withdrawal, of life-sustaining treatment pursuant to sections 1794
2133.01 to 2133.15 of the Revised Code and, if the applicant has 1795
executed either type of instrument, whether the applicant wishes 1796
the license issued to indicate that the applicant has executed 1797
the instrument; 1798
(8) Whether the applicant is a veteran, active duty, or 1799
reservist of the armed forces of the United States and, if the 1800
applicant is such, whether the applicant wishes the license 1801
issued to indicate that the applicant is a veteran, active duty, 1802
or reservist of the armed forces of the United States by a 1803
military designation on the license. 1804
(B) Every applicant shall certify, on a form approved and 1805

H. B. No. 470 Page 63
As Introduced
furnished by the registrar, all of the following: 1806
(1) That the motor vehicle in which the applicant intends 1807
to take the driving skills test is representative of the type of 1808
motor vehicle that the applicant expects to operate as a driver; 1809
(2) That the applicant is not subject to any 1810
disqualification or out-of-service order, or license suspension, 1811
revocation, or cancellation, under the laws of this state, of 1812
another state, or of a foreign jurisdiction and does not have 1813
more than one driver's license issued by this or another state 1814
or a foreign jurisdiction; 1815
(3) Any additional information, certification, or evidence 1816
that the registrar requires by rule in order to ensure that the 1817
issuance of a commercial driver's license or commercial driver's 1818
license temporary instruction permit to the applicant is in 1819
compliance with the law of this state and with federal law. 1820
(C) Every applicant shall execute a form, approved and 1821
furnished by the registrar, under which the applicant consents 1822
to the release by the registrar of information from the 1823
applicant's driving record. 1824
(D) The registrar or a deputy registrar, in accordance 1825
with section 3503.11 of the Revised Code, shall register as an 1826
elector any applicant for a commercial driver's license or for a 1827
renewal or duplicate of such a license under this chapter, if 1828
the applicant is appears to be eligible and wishes to be 1829
registered as an elector. The decision of an applicant whether 1830
to register as an elector shall be given no consideration in the 1831
decision of whether to issue the applicant a license or a 1832
renewal or duplicate. 1833
(E) The registrar or a deputy registrar, in accordance 1834

H. B. No. 470 Page 64
As Introduced
with section 3503.11 of the Revised Code, shall offer the 1835
opportunity of completing transmit information of a notice of 1836
change of residence or change of name to for any applicant for a 1837
commercial driver's license or for a renewal or duplicate of 1838
such a license who is a resident of this state, if the applicant 1839
is a registered elector who has changed the applicant's 1840
residence or name and has not previously filed such a notice of 1841
change of residence or change of name. 1842
(F) In considering any application submitted pursuant to 1843
this section, the bureau of motor vehicles may conduct any 1844
inquiries necessary to ensure that issuance or renewal of a 1845
commercial driver's license would not violate any provision of 1846
the Revised Code or federal law. 1847
(G) In addition to any other information it contains, the 1848
form approved and furnished by the registrar of motor vehicles 1849
for an application for a commercial driver's license, restricted 1850
commercial driver's license, or a commercial driver's license 1851
temporary instruction permit or an application for a duplicate 1852
of such a license or permit shall inform applicants that the 1853
applicant must present a copy of the applicant's DD-214 or an 1854
equivalent document in order to qualify to have the license, or 1855
permit, or duplicate indicate that the applicant is a veteran, 1856
active duty, or reservist of the armed forces of the United 1857
States based on a request made pursuant to division (A)(8) of 1858
this section. 1859
Sec. 4507.06. (A)(1) Every application for a driver's 1860
license, motorcycle operator's license or endorsement, or motor- 1861
driven cycle or motor scooter license or endorsement, or 1862
duplicate of any such license or endorsement, shall be made upon 1863
the approved form furnished by the registrar of motor vehicles 1864

H. B. No. 470 Page 65
As Introduced
and shall be signed by the applicant. 1865
Every application shall state the following: 1866
(a) The applicant's name, date of birth, social security 1867
number if such has been assigned, sex, general description, 1868
including height, weight, color of hair, and eyes, residence 1869
address, including county of residence, duration of residence in 1870
this state, and country of citizenship; 1871
(b) Whether the applicant previously has been licensed as 1872
an operator, chauffeur, driver, commercial driver, or motorcycle 1873
operator and, if so, when, by what state, and whether such 1874
license is suspended or canceled at the present time and, if so, 1875
the date of and reason for the suspension or cancellation; 1876
(c) Whether the applicant is now or ever has been 1877
afflicted with epilepsy, or whether the applicant now has any 1878
physical or mental disability or disease and, if so, the nature 1879
and extent of the disability or disease, giving the names and 1880
addresses of physicians, certified nurse-midwives if authorized 1881
as described in section 4723.438 of the Revised Code, clinical 1882
nurse specialists, or certified nurse practitioners then or 1883
previously in attendance upon the applicant; 1884
(d) Whether an applicant for a duplicate driver's license, 1885
duplicate license containing a motorcycle operator endorsement, 1886
or duplicate license containing a motor-driven cycle or motor 1887
scooter endorsement has pending a citation for violation of any 1888
motor vehicle law or ordinance, a description of any such 1889
citation pending, and the date of the citation; 1890
(e) If an applicant has not certified the applicant's 1891
willingness to make an anatomical gift under section 2108.05 of 1892
the Revised Code, whether the applicant wishes to certify 1893

H. B. No. 470 Page 66
As Introduced
willingness to make such an anatomical gift, which shall be 1894
given no consideration in the issuance of a license or 1895
endorsement; 1896
(f) Whether the applicant has executed a valid durable 1897
power of attorney for health care pursuant to sections 1337.11 1898
to 1337.17 of the Revised Code or has executed a declaration 1899
governing the use or continuation, or the withholding or 1900
withdrawal, of life-sustaining treatment pursuant to sections 1901
2133.01 to 2133.15 of the Revised Code and, if the applicant has 1902
executed either type of instrument, whether the applicant wishes 1903
the applicant's license to indicate that the applicant has 1904
executed the instrument; 1905
(g) Whether the applicant is a veteran, active duty, or 1906
reservist of the armed forces of the United States and, if the 1907
applicant is such, whether the applicant wishes the applicant's 1908
license to indicate that the applicant is a veteran, active 1909
duty, or reservist of the armed forces of the United States by a 1910
military designation on the license. 1911
(2) Every applicant for a driver's license applying in 1912
person at a deputy registrar office shall be photographed at the 1913
time the application for the license is made. The application 1914
shall state any additional information that the registrar 1915
requires. 1916
(B) The registrar or a deputy registrar, in accordance 1917
with section 3503.11 of the Revised Code, shall register as an 1918
elector to vote any person who applies for a license or 1919
endorsement under division (A) of this section, or for a renewal 1920
or duplicate of the license or endorsement, if the applicant is 1921
appears to be eligible and wishes to be registered as an 1922
electorto vote. The decision of an applicant whether to register 1923

H. B. No. 470 Page 67
As Introduced
as an elector shall be given no consideration in the decision of 1924
whether to issue the applicant a license or endorsement, or a 1925
renewal or duplicate. 1926
(C) The registrar or a deputy registrar, in accordance 1927
with section 3503.11 of the Revised Code, shall offer the 1928
opportunity of completing transmit information of a notice of 1929
change of residence or change of name to for any applicant for a 1930
driver's license or endorsement under division (A) of this 1931
section, or for a renewal or duplicate of the license or 1932
endorsement, if the applicant is a registered elector who has 1933
changed the applicant's residence or name and has not previously 1934
filed such a notice of change of residence or change of name. 1935
(D) In addition to any other information it contains, the 1936
approved form furnished by the registrar of motor vehicles for 1937
an application for a license or endorsement or an application 1938
for a duplicate of any such license or endorsement shall inform 1939
applicants that the applicant must present a copy of the 1940
applicant's DD-214 or an equivalent document in order to qualify 1941
to have the license or duplicate indicate that the applicant is 1942
a veteran, active duty, or reservist of the armed forces of the 1943
United States based on a request made pursuant to division (A) 1944
(1)(g) of this section. 1945
Sec. 4507.51. (A)(1) Every application for an 1946
identification card or duplicate shall be made on an approved 1947
form furnished by the registrar of motor vehicles and shall be 1948
signed by the applicant. The application also shall be signed by 1949
the applicant's parent or guardian, or by the department of 1950
rehabilitation and correction or the department of youth 1951
services, as applicable, if the applicant is under eighteen 1952
years of age. 1953

H. B. No. 470 Page 68
As Introduced
Every application shall contain the following information: 1954
(a) The applicant's name, date of birth, sex, general 1955
description including the applicant's height, weight, hair 1956
color, and eye color, address, country of citizenship, and 1957
social security number. 1958
(b) If an applicant has not already certified the 1959
applicant's willingness to make an anatomical gift under section 1960
2108.05 of the Revised Code, whether the applicant wishes to 1961
certify willingness to make such an anatomical gift and 1962
information about the requirements of sections 2108.01 to 1963
2108.29 of the Revised Code that apply to persons who are less 1964
than eighteen years of age. The statement regarding willingness 1965
to make such a donation shall be given no consideration in the 1966
decision of whether to issue an identification card. 1967
(c) Whether the applicant has executed a valid durable 1968
power of attorney for health care pursuant to sections 1337.11 1969
to 1337.17 of the Revised Code or has executed a declaration 1970
governing the use or continuation, or the withholding or 1971
withdrawal, of life-sustaining treatment pursuant to sections 1972
2133.01 to 2133.15 of the Revised Code and, if the applicant has 1973
executed either type of instrument, whether the applicant wishes 1974
the identification card issued to indicate that the applicant 1975
has executed the instrument. 1976
(d) Whether the applicant is a veteran, active duty, or 1977
reservist of the armed forces of the United States and, if the 1978
applicant is such, whether the applicant wishes the 1979
identification card issued to indicate that the applicant is a 1980
veteran, active duty, or reservist of the armed forces of the 1981
United States by a military designation on the identification 1982
card. 1983

H. B. No. 470 Page 69
As Introduced
(2) Each applicant applying in person at a deputy 1984
registrar office shall be photographed at the time of making an 1985
application. 1986
(3) The registrar or deputy registrar, in accordance with 1987
section 3503.11 of the Revised Code, shall register as an 1988
elector to vote any person who applies for an identification 1989
card or duplicate if the applicant is appears to be eligible and 1990
wishes to be registered as an electorto vote. The decision of an 1991
applicant whether to register as an elector shall be given no 1992
consideration in the decision of whether to issue the applicant 1993
an identification card or duplicate. 1994
(4) The application shall be accompanied by any necessary 1995
documents, as required by the registrar. The registrar or the 1996
deputy registrar may authenticate the submitted documents and 1997
verify the information in the application. 1998
(B)(1) Except as provided in division (B)(2) of this 1999
section or section 4507.061 of the Revised Code, the application 2000
for an identification card or duplicate shall be filed in the 2001
office of the registrar or deputy registrar. Each applicant 2002
shall present documentary evidence as required by the registrar 2003
of the applicant's age and identity, and the applicant shall 2004
swear that all information given is true. 2005
All applications for an identification card or duplicate 2006
under this section shall be filed in duplicate, and if submitted 2007
to a deputy registrar, a copy shall be forwarded to the 2008
registrar. The registrar shall prescribe rules for the manner in 2009
which a deputy registrar is to file and maintain applications 2010
and other records. The registrar shall maintain a suitable, 2011
indexed record of all applications denied and cards issued or 2012
canceled. 2013

H. B. No. 470 Page 70
As Introduced
(2) The application for an identification card filed by 2014
either the department of rehabilitation and correction or the 2015
department of youth services on behalf of an individual in 2016
prison or in the department's custody shall be submitted through 2017
the process established by the registrar. The registrar shall 2018
establish the process for submission of such applications and 2019
the process for mailing the identification card to either the 2020
individual or the applicable department. 2021
(C) In addition to any other information it contains, the 2022
form furnished by the registrar of motor vehicles for an 2023
application for an identification card or duplicate shall inform 2024
applicants that the applicant must present a copy of the 2025
applicant's DD-214 or an equivalent document in order to qualify 2026
to have the card or duplicate indicate that the applicant is an 2027
honorably discharged veteran of the armed forces of the United 2028
States based on a request made pursuant to division (A)(2)(b) of 2029
this section. 2030
Section 2. That existing sections 3501.05, 3503.09, 2031
3503.12, 3503.13, 3503.16, 3503.19, 3503.21, 3503.28, 3503.30, 2032
3503.33, 3505.181, 3505.183, 3599.11, 3599.18, 4506.07, 4507.06, 2033
and 4507.51 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed. 2034
Section 3. That section 3503.11 of the Revised Code is 2035
hereby repealed. 2036
Section 4. (A)(1) Except as otherwise provided in division 2037
(A)(2) of this section, the Bureau of Motor Vehicles and 2038
Department of Medicaid shall provide to the Secretary of State 2039
electronic records of the previous four years concerning each 2040
person who appears to be eligible to register or preregister to 2041
vote or to update the person's registration or preregistration 2042
and about whom the Bureau or Department possesses all of the 2043

H. B. No. 470 Page 71
As Introduced
following information as of the effective date of this section 2044
for the purpose of automatically registering or preregistering 2045
the person to vote or updating the person's registration or 2046
preregistration in accordance with this section: 2047
(a) The person's legal name; 2048
(b) The person's residence address; 2049
(c) The person's date of birth; 2050
(d) The number of the person's driver's license or state 2051
identification card or the last four digits of the person's 2052
Social Security number; 2053
(e) Whether the person is a United States citizen; 2054
(f) An electronic image of the person's signature. 2055
(2) The Bureau of Motor Vehicles and Department of 2056
Medicaid shall not include in the information transmitted to the 2057
Secretary of State under division (A)(1) of this section any 2058
information about a person who appears to be eligible to vote or 2059
preregister to vote or to update the person's voter registration 2060
or preregistration but who has provided an address designated by 2061
the Secretary of State for participants in the address 2062
confidentiality program described in sections 111.41 to 111.48 2063
of the Revised Code or otherwise has indicated to the Bureau or 2064
Department that the person is a participant in that program. 2065
(B)(1) Upon receiving information concerning a person 2066
under division (A)(1) of this section, the Secretary of State 2067
promptly shall transmit that information to the board of 2068
elections of the county in which the person resides. If the 2069
board determines that the person appears to be eligible to 2070
register or preregister to vote or to update the person's 2071

H. B. No. 470 Page 72
As Introduced
registration or preregistration, except as otherwise provided in 2072
division (C) of this section, the board shall register or 2073
preregister the person to vote or update the person's 2074
registration or preregistration, as applicable. The electronic 2075
record transmitted to the board of elections under this section 2076
shall be considered to be the person's voter registration or 2077
preregistration form. 2078
(2) The board shall send the person a notice, on a form 2079
prescribed by the Secretary of State, with return postage 2080
prepaid by the board, that contains all of the following 2081
information: 2082
(a)(i) The fact that the person will be registered to vote 2083
or have the person's registration updated for purposes of the 2084
next election occurring at least thirty days after the date the 2085
Secretary of State received the person's information, unless the 2086
person declines to be registered to vote or to update the 2087
person's registration; or 2088
(ii) The fact that the person will be preregistered to 2089
vote or have the person's preregistration updated, unless the 2090
person declines to be preregistered to vote or to update the 2091
person's preregistration. 2092
(b)(i) A statement that in order to register to vote, the 2093
person must be a United States citizen, at least eighteen years 2094
of age at the time of the next general election, and have lived 2095
in this state for thirty days immediately preceding the next 2096
election; or 2097
(ii) A statement that in order to preregister to vote, the 2098
person must be a United States citizen, at least sixteen or 2099
seventeen years of age, and have lived in this state for thirty 2100

H. B. No. 470 Page 73
As Introduced
days immediately preceding the next election. 2101
(c) A statement instructing the person to decline to be 2102
registered or preregistered to vote if the person is not 2103
eligible to register or preregister; 2104
(d) The procedure to decline to be registered or 2105
preregistered to vote or to update the person's registration or 2106
preregistration, or to provide corrected registration or 2107
preregistration information, by signing and returning the card 2108
to the Secretary of State or the board of elections; 2109
(e) The precinct in which the person will be registered or 2110
preregistered to vote; 2111
(f) A statement in bold type as follows: 2112
"Voters must bring photo identification to the polls in 2113
order to verify identity. Voters who do not provide photo 2114
identification will still be able to vote by casting a 2115
provisional ballot." 2116
(3) The notice shall be by nonforwardable mail. If the 2117
notice is returned to the board, it shall investigate and cause 2118
the notice to be delivered to the correct address. If, after 2119
investigating, the board is unable to verify the person's 2120
correct address, it shall send the person a confirmation notice 2121
by forwardable mail and cause the person's name in the official 2122
registration or preregistration list and in the poll list or 2123
signature pollbook, if applicable, to be marked to indicate that 2124
the person's notice was returned to the board. 2125
At the first election at which an elector whose name has 2126
been so marked appears to vote, the elector shall be required to 2127
provide identification to the election officials and to vote by 2128
provisional ballot under section 3505.181 of the Revised Code. 2129

H. B. No. 470 Page 74
As Introduced
If the provisional ballot is counted pursuant to division (B)(3) 2130
of section 3505.183 of the Revised Code, the board shall correct 2131
that elector's registration, if needed, and shall remove the 2132
indication that the elector's notice was returned from that 2133
elector's name on the official registration list and on the poll 2134
list or signature pollbook. If the provisional ballot is not 2135
counted pursuant to division (B)(4)(a)(i), (v), or (vi) of 2136
section 3505.183 of the Revised Code, the elector's registration 2137
shall be canceled. The board shall notify the elector by United 2138
States mail of the cancellation. 2139
(C)(1) A board of elections shall not register or 2140
preregister a person to vote or update an elector's registration 2141
or preregistration under this section if the board determines 2142
that the person is not eligible to register or preregister or to 2143
update the elector's registration or preregistration or if the 2144
person declines to register or preregister or to update the 2145
elector's registration or preregistration. 2146
(2) If, after a person has been registered or 2147
preregistered to vote under this section, the person declines to 2148
register or preregister, the board of elections shall treat the 2149
declination as a request to cancel the person's registration or 2150
preregistration. 2151
(3) If, after an elector's registration or preregistration 2152
has been updated under this section, the elector declines to 2153
update the elector's registration or preregistration, the board 2154
of elections shall correct the elector's registration or 2155
preregistration to reflect the name, address, or both, as 2156
applicable, that it contained before the board updated the 2157
elector's registration or preregistration under this section. 2158
(D) The provisions of the Revised Code amended or enacted 2159

H. B. No. 470 Page 75
As Introduced
by this act concerning the automatic voter registration system 2160
described in section 3503.11 of the Revised Code, as enacted by 2161
this act, apply to this section. 2162
Section 5. The General Assembly, applying the principle 2163
stated in division (B) of section 1.52 of the Revised Code that 2164
amendments are to be harmonized if reasonably capable of 2165
simultaneous operation, finds that the following sections, 2166
presented in this act as composites of the sections as amended 2167
by the acts indicated, are the resulting versions of the 2168
sections in effect prior to the effective date of the sections 2169
as presented in this act: 2170
Section 3503.21 of the Revised Code as amended by both 2171
H.B. 359 and S.B. 63 of the 131st General Assembly. 2172
Section 3505.183 of the Revised Code as amended by both 2173
H.B. 45 and H.B. 458 of the 134th General Assembly. 2174